In my opinion, the literature program was formed by the ladies of Balzac's age based on their interests.
From Russian literature of the 19th century, we preferred Danilevsky and Volkov.
Of course, they wrote fiction, but from the point of view of those same young ladies of the Balzacian age.
But the psychology and suffering of the heroines of Tolstoy and Turgenev are not so interesting for teenagers.
The psychology of the characters is rarely of interest to children.
Thank you very much, it was very interesting.
Perhaps the roses were stuffed to look like a certain type?
There are roses of this color and structure of petals, resembling velvet, as a rule, in dark red and burgundy tones.
And the light-colored roses look different, with their petals having a satin or silk sheen.
Sharks attack surfers, mistaking them for turtles...
Bears, apparently, are like the color-blind.
Bears eat garbage...
Gorillas are not allowed to look directly into the eyes - in some safari parks visitors are given glasses with eyes drawn on them looking in the direction.
Bees still rely on smell...
The Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105x195 mattress.
The Prestige Micro-Package model: comfort and natural composition.
The mattress has different firmness on each side: the medium-firm surface is made of coconut fibre and natural latex, and the moderately soft surface is made of natural latex.
The spring block with 1000 springs per square meter quickly adapts to the body of the sleeper, warning of the "wave" or "gamma" effect.
Among the advantages of the model, it is necessary to highlight the breathable materials.
Latex, perforated for breathability, breathes naturally like coconuts.
This maintains a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
The mattress also comes with an extended warranty.
The manufacturer’s official warranty is 5 years, in practice the mattress’s lifespan is longer.
Dust and dirt protection is provided by a removable Jacquard cover supplied as part of the kit.
Buy a pair of orthopedic pillows to go with the mattress - they are recommended for keeping the spine in an optimal position during sleep.
The filler determines the purpose of the sides – coconuts serve as an anatomical support for the back, latex relaxes the muscles.
Include the brain and go after such relatives!
It's better to have none than such...
Either find a third party driver, or someone who is willing to invest and work with you.
If it doesn't work out, sell the car, even at a loss, don't regret it.
Next time, you will think better...
Andrei has explained clearly that pensioners will not work in the command line, they will work in the school.
The computer teacher will not be able to help either, he was not taught this, the school plays games in Windows.
So there is no support.
I shudder to remember those parties and guests at my parents' house.
Guests are at the door, and the burgers are still cooking on the grill, mom is rocking the baby to sleep in the rocking chair by the fireplace.
Lord, he has already sat down without strength.
And then you have to wash the dishes, clean the house.
A week before the holiday, you haul groceries, two days you scrub, one day you clean up.
What about the guests?
They are good and it is obligatory to take a cake with you.
Since then, I don't like holidays, guests.
Even for his family, he covers the table with a tablecloth.
And I cook the ice cream myself, I bake it very often just like that.
Germany: Fourth COVID-19 vaccine is inevitable
A fourth vaccine will be needed in the summer or fall of 2022.
According to the expert, the current vaccination in Germany will not be the final one, but will continue with renewed vigor.
Despite an active vaccination campaign in Germany, it is likely that two or three doses of the coronavirus vaccine will not be enough to provide full protection.
The head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigelt, is convinced of this.
This is reported by Die Welt on Saturday, 11 December.
"We expect that the fourth vaccination will be needed in the summer, at the latest in autumn," an expert believes.
In addition, Wagner hopes that the fourth coronavirus vaccine can be given "in combination with the flu vaccine".
This will help achieve the best results.
In addition, boosted vaccination may help in the fight against the spread of the new coronavirus strain "Omicron".
In fact, the new variant is particularly dangerous.
The probability of reinfection with Omicron is three times higher than with Delta or Beta strains.
This is evidenced by preliminary research conducted in South Africa.
Based on this, BioNTech/Pfizer plan to provide an adapted vaccine for Omikron by March 2022.
The companies stressed that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against the new coronavirus variant "Omicron".
BioNTech and Pfizer's study showed that the vaccine's effectiveness is significantly reduced: "neutralizing potential is reduced by more than 25 times".
"This indicates that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the omicron strain," BioNTech and Pfizer stressed.
Therefore, a third dose is required.
Experts insist on speeding up the pace of vaccinations in the country.
For example, the president of the German Society of Infectious Diseases, Bernhard Salzgeber, advocates shortening the interval between the second and third vaccinations.
Moreover, as Salzberger believes, accelerated vaccination will have an impact on the spread of both the delta and omicron variants of the coronavirus.
“Israel’s experience is very convincing in this regard”, the expert stressed.
Wobler Pontoon21, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54 mm, 8.5 g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special branch of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (as well as the Kalikana Vib series) differs from many other vibes in that it was originally designed for ice fishing, not just for trolling.
These vibs have a greater weight than their counterparts of the same size, which, without a doubt, positively affects the nuances of using these interesting lures.
Another recognizable feature is the upper lip of rigid and elastic plastic, which creates additional vibration tones when vertical and horizontal conductors are used.
As a "winter vibe," Bet-A-Vib demonstrates quite aggressive play.
Often the most arresting is a simple monotone animation, such as the up-and-down motion of a pendulum with hardly any pauses.
When planning a deviation from the vertical axis, it is not very large, which is convenient when fishing in a limited space, cluttered with underwater vegetation, kelp and other obstacles, which can be snagged.
In addition, a small deviation is relevant when fishing for winter pike and large perch, and especially in the middle of winter, when a pinpoint and aggressive presentation is required.
Reaching the end of the trajectory, Bet-A-Vib immediately turns around and returns to its original vertical.
Bet-A-Vib is also successfully used for winter fishing for perch.
To please her whims, you can choose between two modifications: with a noise-cancelling capsule (NS – NanoSound) or without it (SL – Silent).
It was also noted that Bet-A-Vib can irritate a passive fish, even one that doesn't react to a live bait.
The Bet-A-Vib lure demonstrates range and accuracy.
This buckle is understandable and not fussy, it goes well with leather and braided straps even of large diameters.
For catching bream, roach, chub or crucian carp, a "step" or "jigging" is also effective, sometimes with a "chirming" on the bottom.
If you're fishing in snags, you can change the front treble to a double, which will reduce the chances of getting snagged.
Among its class, Bet-A-Vib is one of the most reliable and, as a result, one of the most catchable.
It can be used with equal success on relatively small and fairly deep areas.
All models are equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young slackers are sitting on the shoulders of their old-age parents.
"The Golden Youth" are clearly the laziest of the lot, who know nothing and are unable to do anything.
A life of ease leads to laziness.
Perhaps Mishustin was referring to this large part of the population.
You are, of course, joking.
She has never seen shoes in this store that she would like to buy.
What are you writing about for such a long time?
The shoes are made of leather.
Good if one season lasts.
Zenden is on the same level as Karius.
A couple of trips, a look and a realisation that there's nothing to be done.
In Libya, it was reported that 7,000 Russian mercenaries
More than 7,000 private military company (PMC) Wagner mercenaries are stationed in Libya.
This was stated by the Chairman of the Supreme Council of the Republic, Haled al-Mishri, on Sunday, December 12.
Currently, there are more than 7,000 Wagner mercenaries in Libya.
They also have planes.
They also dig trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 air-to-air missiles at the Ghardabiya airbase (also used as a civilian airport in Sirte), the Anadolu Agency quotes him.
Khaled al-Mishri also said that Russian mercenaries "are trying to seize" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
Maintain presence
According to the source, Moscow was looking for a country to maintain its presence in North Africa and "settled in Libya".
"Wagner" has been in Libya since 2019, using an airbase and port in Sirte, and an airbase in Djebel, according to the agency's report.
Russian authorities officially deny that the Wagner Group is receiving support from the Kremlin.
Where else can you find mercenaries
According to the agency, Wagner is reportedly active in nine African countries - CAR, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training for local forces, personal protection for leaders and protection of energy facilities.
In exchange for these services, Wagner's subsidiaries receive certain privileges and licenses to use mineral resources and natural resources, as well as to supply weapons, technologies and military services to these countries, the article says.
According to the media, the "Wagnerites" allegedly fought in the Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan and CAR.
This group is not listed in the security services or the register of legal entities, and its fighters are not listed in the personnel roster.
The company is subject to US sanctions.
We recall that earlier, the EU's post-presidents approved restrictions against "Wagner".
It is expected that the Council of the European Union will approve this decision on December 13.
The situation in Libya
The Supreme Council of Libya de facto is the second chamber of parliament with consultative functions, which is dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
The body has repeatedly called for the postponement of the single election day for the election of deputies of the parliament and the head of state from December 24 at least until February 2022.
"There are less than two weeks left until the elections, and the chances of them being held on time are rapidly diminishing," the material notes.
In the meantime, the High Electoral Commission of Libya has postponed the announcement of the final list of candidates, according to Sky News Arabia.
Foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see more success in the country's foreign policy than failure, 29% believe that failures predominate.
"Success examples - "Syria defended, restored peace there", "the decision on the "Northern Stream-2"", "the whole world was scared, the heavy weapons were destroyed", "Crimea we got back".
The main failures are “conflict with Ukraine”, “conflict with the West”, “isolation from the world”, the study by the Public Opinion Foundation says.
Dubai government has completely gone paperless - all government services are now digital
Dubai's government has announced a complete shift from paper-based processes to digital technologies.
All state services to the population will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This was reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new era of digitalisation of all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully digital government," said His Highness Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, Crown Prince of Dubai and Chairman of the Executive Council of Dubai, in a statement on Saturday.
Now, internal and external document exchange in all government departments of Dubai will be carried out only in digital form through special information platforms.
The new initiative affected all sectors: healthcare, housing, police, municipal authorities, courts and so on. The government's initiative was also supported by many commercial structures.
The transition to an electronic government and the digitization of document circulation began in Dubai in 2018.
In that time, it was estimated that 336 million sheets of paper have been saved, which amounts to 14 million hours of human labor and $353.8 million in monetary value.
Earlier, Moscow Mayor Sergey Sobyanin stated that electronic services save citizens two days a year.
Well, about the dates of birth and how many years the child is, this is already a joke, about the class and group in the kindergarten too.
I don't believe that such things exist.
If they do, they are clearly not important to them, not even to the family.
My mother, her two brothers and grandfather and grandmother lived on 3 Vladimirskaya, there was one floor without bars.
They first knocked on the door, then on the window, then decided not to be formal and broke the window and got in, but grandpa had a baseball bat, which they received.
These people knew for sure that there was someone at home...
Turkey car production and exports fall below 2020 levels
Turkey's car production and exports fell sharply in November as the lira depreciated.
As a result, the industry's performance for the 11-month period was worse than last year, Bloomberg reports, citing data from the Association of Turkish Automobile Manufacturers.
According to the association, 115,000 cars were released from the factories in Turkey in November, which is 20% less than last year.
More than 759,000 cars were exported, which is more than 25% less than the previous year.
And if in the first 10 months of this year, the automotive sector of Turkey demonstrated positive dynamics compared to the previous year, then in the 11 months of 2021, the production of cars was already 0.3% lower than the previous year.
The reason for this fall was a sharp weakening of the Turkish lira, which in November fell by 29% against the dollar.
This led to a decline in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 MSB clients received credit payment deferrals in 2021
First Deputy Prime Minister Alihan Smailov has spoken about the situation with the provision of benefits to small and medium businesses, reports the correspondent of MIA “Kazinform”.
"According to the Republic of Kazakhstan's Agency for Regulation and Development of the Financial Market, in the current year, in accordance with the instruction of the President of the Republic of Kazakhstan dated April 1, 2021, the Decree of the Head of the Agency dated April 9, 2021 No. 127 "On Approval of the Order of the Head of the Agency on the Provision of a Delay in Payment for Loans to Small and Medium-Sized Businesses" was adopted, Alihan Smailov wrote in his response to a parliamentary question.
He reminded that the order stipulated that banks and microfinance organizations providing microfinance services would provide a grace period for payment of loans granted before April 1, 2021 to SMEs, including sole proprietors, from April 1 to June 30, 2021.
The deferment period was from 30 to 90 days, as chosen by the subject.
The borrower's statement could have specified a different date for payment deferral.
During the grace period, the debtor's claims and lawsuits were suspended, a notice of the need to repay the overdue debt was issued, and the creditor was entitled to collect commissions and other payments," the deputy prime minister noted.
In 2021, banks of the second level received applications for deferment of payments on loans from 603 borrowers-subjects of MCBs, of which 553 borrowers-subjects of MCBs received deferment of payment on a sum of 9.7 billion tenge.
131 subjects of the MFO have submitted applications for deferment, of which 95 have been granted deferment for a total of 105.8 million tenge," A. Smailov concluded.
Pulmonologist Puryazev suggested that people with weak immunity can easily carry the "Okmiron" strain
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immunity may be able to tolerate it better than those with a strong immune response
Pulmonologist Sergey Pusharev explained why the coronavirus strain “Okmyron” may be dangerous.
The cause should be sought in the conditions of the virus's emergence.
Scientists believe that "okmiron" originated in the body of an HIV-infected or immunodeficient person.
That is to say, the mutation did not encounter any resistance from the immune system.
As a result, he is more aggressive.
Because there was no response from the immune system, it became very fast.
Apparently, there are these spikes, spines, maybe more than is normal, and their antibodies were not cut off during the mutations, pulmonologist Sergey Puryashev comments.
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immunity may be more susceptible to "okmiron" than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong response of the body to anything, any infection, is not always good.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is what happens with pneumococcal infections, when young people in their 30s die, while the elderly in their 60s are merely suffering from a cold.
The immune response of the young man is completely inappropriate: there, where one could only threaten with a finger, he beats like a cannon on the birds, concluded Sergey Puryashev.
The doctor also reminded that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the worst of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial or viral.
If the first treatment is very successful and quick, in the second case it is often possible to buy only the symptoms - hope for the body.
The first sign of developing pneumonia will be the onset of the body's toxic reaction - this is a fever, weakness, and malaise.
Respiratory symptoms then follow: difficulty breathing, a sore throat, and a cough.
Pain on the right or left, or abdominal pain, can also be signs of a developing problem.
Meanwhile, in Russia, it may begin to vaccinate the younger generation from 12 to 18 years old by the end of the year.
A virologist, head of the gene engineering laboratory at MFTI, Pavel Volchkov, noted that this category is very actively affected by COVID-19.
The more contacts a school-age child has, the better.
This is the most socially active layer, as well as the children of kindergartens, said Pavel Volchkov, a virologist and head of the genomic engineering laboratory at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology (MIPT).
Huge thanks to the author for this article.
She was happy to refresh her memories...
Teath-In.
In those far-off seventies and eighties, no dance floor was complete without the music of this group.
At home, when getting together with friends, they would dance to their music.
Immunologists have proposed a hypothesis as to why people with obesity are becoming victims of COVID-19
The authors studied the adipose tissue left over from bariatric operations and found that fat cells, known as adipocytes, can be infected with the coronavirus.
The immune cells located in the adipose tissue, the macrophages, were also infected, and showed a strong inflammatory response.
Scientists also examined the fat tissue of patients who died from COVID and found coronavirus particles in the fat surrounding various organs.
It is known that HIV and flu viruses can hide in fat tissue, using it as a reservoir in an attempt to evade the immune system's response.
It is likely that SARS-CoV-2 can do this.
The biologist spoke about the causes of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semen Goloshikin has named the causes of dementia and described the ways of its prevention in an interview with the radio station Sputnik.
According to the World Health Organization, this disease affects more than 55 million people.
The syndrome manifests itself with a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, the person becomes unable to orient themselves even in a familiar environment.
Goloshekin noted that the most common causes of dementia are neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, certain infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression, and alcoholism.
At a behavioural level, factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive engagement are possible," he said.
Dementia is also influenced by harmful habits such as smoking, excessive drinking, poor sleeping habits and a sedentary lifestyle.
Among the first signs of the expert noted forgetfulness, inability to concentrate and a decrease in abstract thinking.
"Hearing loss can be both an early sign of Alzheimer's disease and a risk factor for its development," the biologist added.
To prevent the occurrence of the disease, the World Health Organization recommends maintaining the necessary level of physical activity, training cognitive skills and abilities that require the involvement of memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the department of neurology, neurosurgery and medical genetics of the Federal State Educational Institution of Higher Education RNMU named after
N.I. Pirogov, head of the department of cognitive disorders at the Federal Center for Brain and Neurotechnology, Anna Bogolepova, told about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt returns around 30,000 illegally exported artefacts
In the last 10 years, the government of Cairo has managed to repatriate around 30,000 artifacts that were illegally smuggled out of the country.
This was announced on Saturday, December 11, on the Al-Hayat television channel by the head of the Department of Returned Antiquities of the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, Shaaban Abdel Gawad.
Since 2011, Egypt has been able to recover 29,300 artefacts.
This year alone, the Museum of the Bible in Washington discovered 5300 artifacts of ancient Egyptian civilization," he said.
Abdel Gaouad clarified that all the artifacts smuggled into the country were registered in the archives.
The department's staff are currently working to return them to Egypt.
In particular, specialists "track auctions worldwide and sales on the Internet" through foreign and Egyptian sites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector said that cultural artefacts are restored when they are returned, and then put on display in museums.
One of the returned artifacts was a 20,000-year-old human skeleton discovered in Belgium, which is now part of the Egyptian Civilization National Museum in Cairo.
In 2020, Egyptian authorities appealed to Interpol to help find a sold at a London auction a bust of Pharaoh Tutankhamun.
Christie's auction house held an auction on July 4, at which a bust over 3,000 years old was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million rubles).
This caused dissatisfaction in Egypt.
The Egyptian side also claims that the artefacts were illegally removed from the Karnak temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
The head of Tutankhamun, depicted as the god Amun, had been kept in a private collection and had not been offered for sale since 1985.
How the relic ended up in Europe is unknown.
Egypt has been actively repatriating illegally exported antiquities from the country at various times in recent years.
According to authorities, 95% of the illegal antiquities are the result of "black-market" excavations.
"The Crimean Tatars are not taken into account" - and this is correct, as the Crimean Tatars (232,000) are a separate people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, then only 42 thousand people - so many Tatars (Kazakhs) live in Crimea (see census).
The Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
They are united only by the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants to access staff's personal mobile devices
Credit Suisse requires its employees to provide the bank with access to their personal mobile devices, according to the Financial Times.
The issue is that in Europe and the United States, the Swiss bank does not provide its employees with corporate devices, instead offering a discount on the purchase of a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner - a telecommunications operator.
According to the current rules, the bank can access information on corporate devices issued to its employees, as they are used to solve business issues with colleagues or clients.
The bank uses the right to check mobile devices in extreme cases, for example, if an employee used it to conduct a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now, however, after many employees have switched to remote work, the bank wants to extend this rule to all devices used to resolve work-related issues.
According to the newspaper, the bank's management has set a deadline by which employees can familiarize themselves with the new rule.
Credit Suisse declined to comment on the new requirement.
Sontelle Vivre Dual Royal 70x200 mattress.
The Vivre Dual Royal mattress features a high-quality and durable block of TFK 18 high-autonomous springs.
The natural coconut layers add firmness, the zonal latex distributes the load better, the latex with Aloe provides hygiene in the sleeping area, and the relief foam relaxes.
A symmetrically medium-firm mattress with a high height (30 cm).
The product is packaged in a tightly rolled roll and is ready for use after a short period of unpacking.
The cover is made from a strong tricot fabric with a lining on the comfort layer.
The fabric of the cover does not wrinkle, does not stretch over time.
Part 4
The last year of Sergey Esenin's life, 1925, was productive in terms of creativity, but a difficult one for the poet and his "ego."
He is not affiliated with any literary groups, but he is well known, sought after, and sometimes harshly criticized by critics, but the reading public is willing to carry him in their hands.
More than 60 poems were written in a year, many of which are masterpieces, the Persian motifs cycle was completed, the poem Anna Snegina was written, and 8 books were published, the collection Russkaya Sovetskaya.
And the main success was in June 1925, when the State Publishing House concluded a contract with Esenin to publish his works in three volumes.
No one has been so honored by contemporary poets as Sergei Alexandrovich, he is the first!
In addition, it yielded very good money - the contract provided for a monthly payment of 1000 rubles for 20 months (for example, the director of the plant received 300 rubles per month, the engineer - 200).
The funds were needed as never before.
Esenin married the granddaughter of Leo Tolstoy, Sofya Tolstaya, and had to set up a family life, care for his sisters Katya and Sasha, and his mother-in-law.
Life was going back to normal, there was something to be happy about, but everything was tinged with dark tones, like a nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published after Yezenin's death):
My friend, my friend,
I am very, very ill.
I don't know where this pain came from.
Or the wind is blowing
Over a deserted and empty field.
That is, as the leaves fall in September.
Alcohol is a brain-destroyer.
Many friends noted that Yezenin had a bad day, looked bad, and was clearly ill.
More and more, there are panic attacks and nervous breakdowns.
And the reason, perhaps, is not only alcoholism...
However, if such a diagnosis was made, no documents remain.
For example, in May 1923, when Esenin was advised by his fourth wife, the American actress Ida Duncan, to improve his health in a clinic in Paris under the supervision of Professor Petr Gannushkin (Esenin would return to him two years later, this time in Moscow).
But there are plenty of testimonies of the poet's drunkenness, scandals on this subject, complaints to the police - there are dozens of memoirs on this subject.
From the beginning of the 20s, the poet's terrible romance with the green dragon developed rapidly.
In the summer of 1923, Esenin briefly settled with his friend, the impressionist Ivan Starzhev.
Amazingly, Esenin never had his own home in Moscow or St. Petersburg, and he was always renting apartments, staying in hotels, or staying with friends.
Starcev remembers:
"He only came to sleep, and most of the time in an inebriated state.
One day, returning at four in the morning, Esenin fell on the staircase...
As he fell, he scraped his face and wheezed.
When he came to himself, he began to cough continuously, spraying blood everywhere..."
And Esenin himself admitted after his trip around Europe and the United States (in the States then there was a dry law, but Duncan brought with her a decent amount of alcohol) that:
"I saw nothing there except cabbages and streets...
I have already forgotten about people...
And, of course, he drank...
I was drinking because I was homesick."
Pirelli Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tyre is based on a high-performance rubber and silica compound and provides long-lasting effective use, even wear, and load resistance.
The linear pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre, with its ribs, guarantees low rolling resistance and cornering stability.
Four deep grooves effectively evacuate water, dirt from the Pirelli Scorpion Winter contact patch, reduce skidding and aquaplaning.
3D-lamination strengthens grip on slippery roads, snow and ice.
The large shoulder area of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter improves lateral grip during cornering, increases traction, and reduces braking distance.
Small cracks and burrs keep the heat in.
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom 100x195
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom - modern interpretation of the budget model in the premium class line.
The foundation of the mattress is a block of independent double springs.
A softer spring is inserted inside the larger spring.
This allows for an even distribution of weight on the mattress.
The mattress is supplemented with a filler – artificial latex.
It's like natural latex, but it's denser and more expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort of the mattress.
The artificial latex is hypoallergenic, it does not absorb moisture or dust.
The mattress will suit a couple with a large weight difference (from 30 kilograms).
There is no wave effect here, where the light partner slides away from the heavy one.
The pleasant, soft to the touch cover made of practical jacquard is made of synthetic rubber.
Natural fabrics do not accumulate static electricity.
It may be possible to manufacture this mattress in a rolled-up (vacuum roll) version.
My son is almost 16 and he has been wanting to beat people up for a long time.
All of his energy is focused on choosing what he will do to make a living.
He's far more responsible than I was in his years or my husband, who had a few run-ins with the law up until the wedding.
The father is looking after his young daughter.
And he loved her with a strange love, as Lermontov wrote.
Why did the girl cry at the exam, when she hadn't failed it yet?
Why he didn't tell his daughter it wasn't a school.
She will have a tail.
Well, what?
He will pass.
Millions of students know this.
What are we talking about?
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus is using migrants as "weapons" against the EU
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus uses migrants as "weapons"
Deputy Foreign Minister of Poland Pawel Jablonski expressed the opinion that the President of Belarus Alexander Lukashenko used refugees as "weapons" against the European Union and intends to use them again next year.
The relevant statement was made in an interview with the Australian Financial Review.
According to Yablonsky, the sanctions against Belarus have temporarily "stopped Lukashenko," but he "is actively looking for new ways."
The Polish official also believes that illegal migrants will now be used as weapons "in many parts of the world."
As the kp.ru website wrote, the European Union previously introduced the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
He touched 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
In Europe, they have stated their readiness to expand the restrictive measures against the republic, "if the situation in the country does not improve."
In response, Minsk introduced a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that previously decided to impose sanctions on Belarus.
A 60x100 cm garment bag, with a label, blue colour.
In order for your clothes to serve you for a long time, you need to take care of them properly.
Well-stored items will extend their service life and keep them looking attractive.
This garment bag will help us!
Benefits.
Using a garment bag, you save a lot of space.
It's especially relevant if you have a lot of things and a small dresser.
A well-groomed appearance.
No more dresses, skirts and tops hanging around.
Neatly folded clothes allow you to sort them and hide them from prying eyes.
For those using shelves instead of a regular cabinet, this is the best option.
A garment bag securely protects clothing from dust, dirt, insects, mechanical damage, or fading.
It does not change shape during long-term storage, and prevents the formation of lumps.
The features of the clothing covers.
The special material will allow your clothes to "breathe."
The service life of such a cover is not limited.
They can store not only clothes, but also blankets, pillows, and bed linen.
The cover is sealed with a strong bolt of lightning.
It is important to remember!
Prepare items for long-term storage in advance: clean them, iron out creases.
Choose the optimal size of the cover: things should not bend down.
It is not recommended to hang several bulky items in one cover: they may get wrinkled.
If you value order and cleanliness, take care of your belongings, want to keep them and extend their service life – order a garment cover.
Go to the big catalogue and choose the desired colour and size at a bargain price!
"Not by Senke's hat": when a velvet jacket turns a man into a laughing stock
In 2021, velvet blazers dominated at the non-denominational events.
Perhaps the first to announce their new fashion solution was Daniel Craig.
He was already at the premiere of the film "Not Time to Die" in September, where he appeared in a velvet malachite jacket and a traditional "Bond" butterfly.
After his example, Prince William followed suit, first donning a green velvet blazer that didn't quite match the royal dress code for the Earthshot Prize ceremony, before opting for a more traditional look for the Royal Variety Charity event.
Two weeks ago, the trend was picked up by Lionel Messi.
The footballer came to collect the seventh "Golden Ball" in a velvet jacket by Dolce & Gabbana.
By the way, his sons were dressed in the same.
AliExpress has already noted a growing demand for men's velvet jackets in Russia.
According to the service’s analytics, their sales have increased by 1.4 times.
The most popular are warm velvet blazers with padding and a tailored silhouette, the main colors are dark beige, burgundy, dark blue and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is from 3 to 6 thousand rubles. Men prefer to buy only blazers - they choose them less often than suits.
They can be bought not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, this season, there are almost all the brands - Brioni, Paul Smith, Etro and Saint Laurent.
The most desired model is the Gucci one, in which the brand ambassador Jared Leto appeared.
Choosing expensive brands of jackets, you can be sure that the velvet is made of silk.
Thanks to a special weaving technique, a dense fabric with a hairy outer texture and a smooth inner side is produced.
Cheaper options are made from cotton or polyamide, but they last less.
Fashion expert Ilia Vakhoshkin warns that in the case of the velvet jacket, the most important thing is not its model or style, but appropriateness.
"A velvet jacket requires evening light, so this suit is ideal if you're going to a party or a formal event, explains Vakhshinov. "It will also fit the bill if the invitation specifies a "Black Tie" or "Creative Black Tie" dress code.
Another important criterion, which allows you to make a choice in favor of a velvet jacket, is the status of the buyer.
“A man in a velvet jacket should first of all acquire a proper, well-tailored suit, the authors of the Telegram channel “Handsome Bramwell” believe. “Owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the caste of people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to themed parties, where the dress code is always specified.
Ilya Vakhoshkin suggests combining a jacket made of velvet with similar accessories: classic trousers with studs, a single-colored shirt, a silk tie, a pocket square, and cufflinks.
Too simple and mundane things will look out of place.
Fashion experts from "Krassavich Bramblell" are sure that it will be inappropriate for a regular employee to show up in a velvet jacket at a corporate event, but if it's the CEO who's in charge, then - "yes," it's appropriate.
If the employee is ranked lower and the goal is to move up in the complex corporate hierarchy or to earn financial bonuses, then it is better not to wear a tailored suit.
The management will definitely estimate the phrase “without a cap”, the editors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion believe.
Very ambiguous feelings about the voice.
It's an unnatural sound, so heavy-handed.
And it has nothing to do with the cute face of the young girl.
To be honest, I don't understand the admiration of those around me.
But from the bottom of my heart, I wish you all the best in life!
It's all about the money - alternative energy is well-funded, meaning it is well-paid.
Billions of dollars.
Are they sad?
No, electricity prices have risen.
Traditional energy is also cheaper - and gas, oil and coal have all been cheaper to buy than they are now.
Demand for fuel is high.
A penny drops.
And who was flying over?
As usual, the ordinary buyer.
Are the problems of the Native Americans being touched by the sheriff?
Therefore, it is not correct to consider western politicians as idiots who have "missed" the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a bad joke.
I didn't see one beautiful person in the pictures in the article.
Just average for the average passenger.
Perhaps if such characters are so confident in their beauty that they decide to show it off to the whole carriage, then they will probably not be able to resist.
But only because of their mental illness and ignorance, these "beauties" (and not the other way around) are not judged by their appearance.
Kazbek, "a slave who is aware of his slavery and is fighting against it, is a revolutionary.
The slave, unaware of his slavery and living in a silent, unconscious and speechless slavery, is simply a slave.
Rab, who has a runny nose, describes the pleasures of being a slave and praises a good and kind master, is a slave, a scoundrel."
Immunologist says booster shot after 4-5 months will help protect against 'Omicron' strain
Vaccination four to five months later may protect against the new coronavirus strain “Omicron”.
Immunologist Nikolay Kryuchkov said that the vaccination six months after the appearance of the new strain is “a very long period”
"In the previous strains, such a period was normal, but now it is better to carry out the procedure five months later, and for people with chronic diseases - four months," the expert said, urging to simultaneously with the vaccination campaign to start revaccination.
Kruchkov also noted that early revaccination provides a good titer of neutralizing antibodies.
"If a person has received two vaccines and a booster, or has recovered from the flu and been vaccinated, or has been vaccinated and recovered from the flu, then they have "hybrid immunity", meaning they have antibodies from both the vaccine and the flu, which is enough to protect them," the expert explained.
The ‘Big Seven’ warned Russia of ‘massive consequences’ if it invaded Ukraine
The "Big Seven" (the United Kingdom, Germany, Italy, Canada, the United States, France and Japan) published a statement following the meeting of their foreign ministers in Liverpool.
It states that Russia's "military aggression" against Ukraine "will have huge consequences and will be costly" for Moscow, but specific measures are not described in the document.
"We, the Foreign Ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States of America, and the High Representative of the European Union, are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
The ministers then called on Russia to "de-escalate, use diplomatic channels and comply with its international obligations on transparency of military activities," as President Biden said during a video call with Russian President Vladimir Putin on December 7.
"We confirm our support for France and Germany's efforts in the Normandy format to achieve full implementation of the Minsk agreements to resolve the conflict in eastern Ukraine," the foreign ministers of the "Big Seven" also said.
Any use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited under international law.
Russia should not doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have huge consequences and a serious price to pay," they warn.
We confirm our unwavering commitment to Ukraine’s sovereignty and territorial integrity, as well as the right of any sovereign state to determine its own future.
We welcome the cautious position of Ukraine.
We will intensify our cooperation in our common and comprehensive response," the statement said.
Earlier in the day, British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss said that Russia would face "serious consequences" if it invaded Ukraine.
According to her, this meeting showed the "unified voice of the "Big Seven", which accounts for 50% of the world's GDP, and which very clearly stated that the invasion of Ukraine will have huge consequences for Russia."
Pfizer vaccine found to be 32 times less effective against omicron strain
The Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine's efficacy against the omicron variant is 32 times lower than against other strains of the virus.
The findings were reported by South China Morning Post (SCMP).
The vaccine was deemed less effective based on a study of antiviral activity in people who received two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine.
"We see that most people had a high level of anti-viral activity against the original Sars-CoV-2 variant, but this ability was significantly reduced against the Omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris said.
At the same time, scientists emphasized that vaccination remains the most effective way to protect against the severe course of the disease in the event of a coronavirus infection.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of a coronavirus pandemic taking into account the influence of the omicron strain.
The authors of the study concluded that the omicron strain may cause a new wave of circulation of the virus and an increase in mortality if additional measures are not taken.
Ukraine’s Defense Ministry accuses Germany of blocking the supply of NATO weapons to Kiev
The head of the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense, Alexey Reznikov, accused the government of former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking the purchase of deadly weapons by Kiev within the framework of NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on December 12, Reznikov reminded that in the previous month, Germany vetoed the purchase of Ukrainian anti-sniper systems and rifles for the destruction of drones.
At the same time, it is noted that later Berlin softened its position on rifles, recognizing them as lethal weapons.
According to the defense minister, Kiev is determined to acquire the aforementioned weapons within the framework of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, this refers to the United States, Great Britain, Lithuania and France.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the new German government under Chancellor Olaf Scholz's leadership remains unclear on the issue of supplying weapons to Ukraine.
Earlier on Sunday, the Ukrainian ambassador to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, expressed the opinion that Kyiv should not expect weapons deliveries from Berlin while Chancellor Scholz is in office.
According to him, the previous German government explained its refusal to provide weapons by the risk of military escalation in the Donbass, despite the "occupation" of part of Ukrainian territory by Russia.
The diplomat is confident that Germany will maintain the same "nonsensical" position even under a new chancellor.
In August, the Ukrainian leader, Vladimir Zelensky, stated that Kiev expects assistance from Berlin in equipping the navy.
In Ukraine, it is expected that Germany will be a “partner in the technical sense”, the president added.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, the co-chair of the German Green Party, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he spoke in favor of the sale of defensive weapons to Kyiv.
Sergei NOSOV 2, no, bad eyesight, no matter.
"And" instead of "E"?
To pass over commas in large numbers?
And you write instead of write.
No, you are illiterate.
For the philologist, this is a disgrace.
Fishing game set: light, sound, complete playing field, 2 rods, 5 figures, 3AA battery not included.
Electric fishing is fun and educational for children.
Playing, the baby will be training fine motor skills, developing dexterity, accuracy and attention.
It's worth turning on the toy, as 5 miniature fish will start to swim around the pretend pond to a cheerful melody.
The child's task is to catch them all!
You can play alone or with a partner: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy works from 3 AAA batteries at 1.5 V (not included).
The playing field (DхШхВ) is 21х17х4 cm.
The item was made from plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
The winners of the Arsenev Prize have been named in Moscow - Russian Gazette
A solemn ceremony of awarding the winners of the third season of the All-Russian Literary Prize “Far East” in honor of
V. K. Arsenyeva passed through Moscow.
As reported on the Instagram prize page, a total of 89 applications were received by the organizing committee this season.
Sixty-three have passed the selection.
The leaders in the number of submitted works were Primorsky and Khabarovsk Krais - 13 and 11 applications.
More than 60 works were submitted for the award in three categories: "Long prose", "Short prose", and "Prose for children".
Nine works made it to the shortlist - three in each category.
Alexander Filkin (Primorsky Krai) won the nomination “Long Prose” with his book “The Inscription on the Gospel”.
The award was presented to the winner by Deputy Prime Minister - Head of the Presidential Executive Office Yuri Trutnev.
In the “Short Fiction” category, the best was awarded to Lyubov Bezbah (Sakhalin Region) for the work “Thunderstorm’s Whisper”.
She received the award from the Minister of the Russian Federation for the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Alexey Chekunkov.
In the “Children’s prose” category, the winner was the Zabaykalsky writer Nina Belomestnova and her “Golden Thread”.
The author was awarded the screenwriter, writer, candidate of philological sciences and the chairman of the Jury Andrei Gelasimov.
All winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
We will remind you that within the framework of the “Far East” award, authors of the best works on the Far Eastern theme are awarded.
The main goal of the award is not only to award the winners and tell about the contemporary authors, but also to attract cultural interest to the Far East, which is a priority development region of the 21st century.
Novels, short stories, collections of short stories or stories, as well as documentary prose and memoirs can be submitted.
In this case, the author’s place of residence is irrelevant, what matters is writing in Russian.
The official website of the prize: https://www.arsenyeva-prize.ru/.
Skoworod, d=22 cm, with handle, black marble, 4278884.
The Kukmara "marble" is made of cast aluminium and is covered with an innovative anti-slip marble coating based on water, reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
The features of the “Marble” series of dishes.
The significant thickness of the walls and bottom prevents deformation of the body, ensures durability, and provides the necessary strength of the coating.
A highly durable anti-slip marble coating on a water base is reinforced with ultra-hard mineral particles.
Environmentally safe non-stick coating without PFOA (perfluorinated carboxylic acid).
An ideal heat distribution across the entire surface of the dish, long-lasting heat retention.
The possibility of using the minimum amount of fat.
The anti-fingerprint marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exceptional durability of the coating during use.
Small scratches and minor imperfections on the surface of the cast iron do not affect the non-stick properties of the coating or the longevity of the cookware.
The products will not spoil and retain their taste.
The possibility of preparing tasty and healthy food without adding oil, as on hot stones.
The bottom is thickened to 6 mm.
High thermal conductivity and ergonomics.
Ease of cleaning.
It is suitable for all types of plates, except induction.
You can wash dishes in a dishwasher.
The wall consists of 6 layers, the inner coating is "marble".
A highly abrasion-resistant water-based coating reinforced with particles of super-hard minerals.
A compacted soil layer.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
The body is made of cast aluminium, up to 6 mm thick.
The exterior anti-corrosive coating is “marble”.
The Kukmara pot will turn the ordinary process of cooking into a pleasant and easy activity for any housewife.
Years... I did the same thing a long time ago.
The hall was combined with the kitchen.
The apartment is three-room.
Was.
Of course, the project, the permit, the new technical passport, everything according to the law.
In the living room, they made a bookshelf and a large wardrobe.
A door was opened in the kitchen, and a lot of space was created.
For almost 10 years of living in this apartment, we have never regretted the decision.
Instead of a bath, they installed a curved bathroom cabinet.
I have regretted this a hundred times!
I only recently realized that I love rum.
But the beautiful world of rum I have not yet opened for myself, except for Bacardi and Captain Morgan.
What else would you advise and from what could one begin this wonderful acquaintance?
I also got sick.
I won't get vaccinated.
He came to the Black Sea for rehabilitation.
Only the weather didn't go well...
The houses are pretty, but normal birds won't want to nest in them, ornithologists say, because they attract a lot of attention.
Plus, paint and other chemicals will deter the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I will definitely try.
And what does Japan have to do with it?
Thanks for the recipe.
What types of apples should be used in this recipe?
It's really good.
I add a little bit of rapeseed and green apple.
Try it.
Recently, a zombie carmaker has declared that the automotive industry is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A table appeared on the screen showing which countries are producing which percentage of these semiconductors (presumably microcontrollers).
Russia was not on the list.
That's it!
In the United States, with their expensive workforce, it is advantageous, but in Russia, it is not!
And my stepmother was scolding me.
I'm sorry, she's not with us.
If I had seen her like this, things could have turned out differently.
But besides hatred, gossip, and scandals, there is nothing to remember.
I am sorry for her, she lived her life in misery.
Mercedes has lodged a protest against the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The Mercedes team, whose driver Lewis Hamilton finished second in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix behind Red Bull's Max Verstappen, has lodged a protest over the final result of the race, the Formula 1 press service reports.
Mercedes believes that the rules of Formula 1 48.12 and 48.8 were violated during the race.
In the first case, the German team is contesting the decision to return the race leaders to the front of the pack.
According to the second, Ferstappen overtook Hamilton before the "restart" zone.
In addition, it should be noted that the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Sebastian Vettel overtook Lewis Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 world championship is provisional, as the Mercedes protests are unknown.
G7 warns Russia of responsibility for invasion of Ukraine
The G7 foreign ministers warned of "serious consequences" for Russia if it continued its military aggression against Ukraine, according to the final statement of the meeting.
The participants of the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of Russian military forces near the country's borders.
"Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have serious consequences and serious costs," the British government's website said in a statement.
G7 and EU ministers said they were "united in their condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine."
UK Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss warned of "serious consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine at a press conference in Liverpool.
We have made it clear that any invasion will have significant consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to abandon its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Earlier, at the summit in Liverpool, G7 foreign ministers agreed that to resolve the crisis caused by the buildup of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine, the parties need to return to the negotiating table.
The talks were in the "Norman format."
The North Atlantic Alliance also took part in the dialogue on Ukraine in the “Normandy format”.
Russian Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said that by calling for Russia and Ukraine to return to the negotiating table, the G7 countries had failed to take responsibility for their own mistakes.
The Homsu Diamond shoulder bag.
The Diamond shoulder bag is perfect for sports, travel, or just going for a walk.
It is convenient to take with you, it is roomy, made of strong and light fabric.
The main section is opened with the help of lightning, which is easy to do even on the move.
Stylish and bright design will suit those ladies who have a refined taste for accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19x12x7 cm and a belt length of 40 to 60 cm, so it can hold various items, from passports to mobile phones.
The material makes it easy to remove the belt pouch using various household items.
For convenience, you can use a special regulator to adjust the size of the strap.
Methods for returning stolen money through online stores have been revealed
There are several ways to get your stolen money back from online stores and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
Experts in information security revealed the details of the incident to RBC.
To reduce the risk of large losses in the event of a data breach, it is recommended to keep the main funds on the card or bank account that are not used for online shopping.
Some of the savings can be put into a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend setting up a separate card for online purchases.
If money was stolen while shopping in stores that do not use 3D Secure technology, you can initiate a refund process.
"In accordance with the rules established by payment systems, unauthorized transactions conducted without the use of 3D Secure are the responsibility of the participant in the payment chain who does not use the service," a representative of Promsvyazbank clarified.
An expert from the international payment provider Ecommpay, Arthur Zaremba, noted that the buyer has the right to file a complaint with the bank within 120 days of the purchase.
In addition, if the perpetrator used a card on online resources that did not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be disputed and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases, online stores themselves return the money to the customer if the order has not yet been sent to delivery.
On November 19, the Public Council member, the director of the Internet Safety League Ekaterina Mizulina reported that in 2021 alone, 11,000 complaints were received about various types of fraud: from the sale of fake documents to identity theft.
According to her, an effective solution in the current circumstances may be the creation of a single window for complaints about online fraudsters.
Scholz arrives in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
Newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis at the Polish-Belarusian border, the independence of the Polish judiciary, the buildup of Russian troops near Ukraine's borders and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
While Schulz has stated his desire to preserve good relations between Germany and Poland for many years, the leaders of the two countries expressed clear expectations of each other.
Polish Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki said he would call on Scholz to oppose the Nord Stream 2 pipeline, which is intended to deliver Russian gas to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
According to Moravec, Russia can use the gas pipeline as a political pressure tool against Europe.
Germany, in turn, supported Poland's efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin said it would help Warsaw and Brussels to resolve this crisis.
However, the Polish judicial system remains one of the sources of disagreement.
The European Court of Justice has fined Poland, finding that the judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland refused to pay the fine and its highest court ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
The new German government, sworn in on Wednesday, despite the demands of Poland and the United States, has not taken on any public commitments to stop the Nord Stream 2 pipeline in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine.
U.S. officials told congressional aides that they had reached an understanding with Germany that the Nord Stream 2 pipeline would be shut down if Russia invaded Ukraine, a senior congressional official said on Tuesday.
German officials have not confirmed these reports, but Scholz warned on Wednesday about the consequences if Russia violates Ukraine's border, and this position was confirmed by representatives of the "Big Seven" on Sunday.
Dmitry, look more carefully.
The view from the window is the same, the size of the window has not changed.
They removed the wall between the kitchen and the room, so you can see part of the second window.
In fact, those who are unfamiliar with the initial planning are doubtful.
But I know such apartments very well and I can clearly see how they have been redesigned.
Let everything go well with them.
It always surprises me when they write about cleaning tools to clean the toilet, the sink, the windowsills, the taps.
You wash them once a year on Easter, right? That's what you have to do.
Just don't pollute.
Minzifry wants to give writers residencies
The government will transfer federal property left over from the Union of Writers of the USSR and the Literary Fund of the USSR to the Future Support Fund for Russian Writers.
Residencies for writers will be created on this basis, the “Parliamentary Gazette” reported in the Ministry of Finance, which will be the foundation of the fund.
The Ministry of Digital Development is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of the Foundation for the Support of Russian Writers.
The explanatory note clarifies that the fund will be responsible for caring for the buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union of Writers and the Literary Fund.
“A significant amount of real estate has been transferred to the ownership of the Russian Federation, which previously belonged to the Literary Fund of the USSR, including objects located in the village of writers Peredelkino, the settlement of Komarovo in the Leningrad region, and others”, the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications, and Mass Media’s press service told “Parliamentary Gazette”.
The project stipulates that the Fund's charter should state that it is created to promote literary activity by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers.
“The creation of conditions for creative activity is understood to mean the creation of writer’s residencies in different regions of Russia, in which there would be comfortable conditions for creativity,” Minzifry explained to us.
520 rubles for one cut tomato?
The yeast puff pastry is literally a layer of dough from a 550-ruble package.
Three pieces of fish in a can for 570…
No, it looks, of course, delicious, but the price is just outrageous.
It seems that the Belarusians gathered all the rich people.
Doctors warn of risks of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19 and before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yarceva and Sergey Tokarev warned of the danger of uncontrolled use of blood-thinning drugs after contracting the coronavirus infection COVID-19 and before vaccination against the coronavirus.
A physician-therapist, immunologist Irina Yarcheva said that self-prevention of the possible formation of clots after COVID-19 may provoke a stroke.
Yarceva explained that anti-coagulants are not for everyone, only if the patient was hospitalized, was in a hospital, and had complications.
The doctor prescribes anti-coagulants (blood-thinning drugs that prevent excessive clot formation) according to indications.
She said that there is a widespread panic - everyone is drinking anti-coagulants and getting complications in the form of hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding into the brain).
The head of the Urals Federal District Prophylactic Medicine Society, the scientific director of the Society of Specialists in Preventive Medicine, Doctor of Medical Sciences Sergey Tokarev told URA.RU in an interview that Russian people are now often using anticoagulants, even before the vaccination against the coronavirus infection.
According to Dr. Tokarev, citizens believe in dubious online advice and start self-medicating.
There are such citizens who, one week before vaccination, start taking anti-coagulants of their own accord.
And before vaccination, doctors notice blood oozing.
He stressed that it is extremely dangerous to take any medication without determining the cause of any symptoms.
Carrots are called a superfood to protect against hypertension
Studies have shown that regular consumption of this common and readily available vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of developing cardiovascular disease.
Carrots are found in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and minerals that help the functioning of internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving blood flow and lowering cholesterol, Semana reports.
Today, heart disease is the leading cause of early death.
To improve the situation, it is not only necessary to treat the disease, but also to eat properly.
One of the helpers in such a situation will be a regular potato.
According to scientists, this root contains a lot of vitamins B1, B3, B6, as well as a very important vitamin C for the body.
In addition, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, as well as riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
Microelements help to effectively work all internal systems of the body.
In addition to all this, the root vegetable fights natural age-related changes in the body, contains a lot of beneficial fiber for the digestive tract.
Regular consumption can prevent atherosclerosis and hypertension.
I have had such a case.
The lady came to see the apartment.
I came from another city to show it.
There were detailed photos and a description of the apartment in the announcement.
She was very dissatisfied because there was no "beautiful" kitchen and "beautiful" balcony.
Apparently, Tetteh has nothing to do, she just looks at other people's apartments, while people are wasting their time.
Around 145,000 adolescents have received the first component of COVID-19 vaccine in Kazakhstan
Information on the vaccination of adolescents, pregnant and breastfeeding women against coronavirus has been published in Kazakhstan, reports MIA “Kazinform” with reference to the Ministry of Health of the Republic of Kazakhstan for the prevention of COVID-19.
Twenty people died of coronavirus and pneumonia in Kazakhstan in one day, 85 people with coronavirus in critical condition - Rospotrebnadzor of the Republic of Kazakhstan Most regions of Kazakhstan are in the "green zone" for coronavirus
As of 11 December 2021, 181,037 people have received the first component of the Pfizer vaccine, and 14,580 people have received the second component.
The first dose: teenagers - 144,613, pregnant women - 10,645, breastfeeding women - 25,779.
The second dose: teenagers - 10,690, pregnant women - 1,141, breastfeeding women - 2,749.
The church will pay $20,000 to the person who found the money in the church wall
The tech who found the money in the church wall in the American state of Texas will be paid the reward.
The information was released in a press release by Crime Stoppers of Houston.
The incident took place at a large evangelical church in Lakewood, where pastor Joel Osteen promises prosperity and success to the faithful.
In November 2021, a plumber, Justin Coyle, repaired one of the church toilets and found thousands of cash and receipts inside the insulation.
He turned the find over to the church and, according to him, did not even receive a thank you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, 'Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand that you did what you could have done," KPRC-TV quotes him as saying.
It appears the find is connected to a theft that happened at Lakewood Church seven years ago.
Around $200,000 in cash and $400,000 in checks were stolen from the church's safe.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer any losses.
However, a reward of $25,000 was announced for information about the criminals.
Justin Coyle could not claim the sum, as the deadline for the award had already passed.
Despite this, the non-profit Crime Stoppers of Houston, which had previously awarded a $5,000 reward and later received $20,000 in donations from Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, it was reported that the police questioned pastor Joel Osteen about the money found in the church's wall.
Tanya, her words, her actions - that's what defines her as a real person.
Therefore, there is a negative attitude towards her.
And it's not that "she is financially much wealthier than all the other writers," as they write here.
There are people who are richer, but not all behave so arrogantly, so provocatively, as this madam.
The Promtex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190x190.
The Soft Cocos 1 orthopedic mattress.
The basis is the TFK block (256 springs per square meter).
Independent springs help to evenly distribute the load.
The filler is coconut coir (material made from the fibres of the coconut palm).
Between the filler and the spring block are layers of wool.
Both sides of the mattress are firmer than average.
Jacquard Sense cover: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The tissue density is 116 g/m².
Again, simply and deliciously.
She asked for recipes for chicken.
We were given a chicken.
They grew it in their own garden, our friends.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
I would like to make it more appetizing.
I want to find a recipe for baked chicken pieces in beer.
Have you tried that?
I trust you more than just Internet recipes.
A new case of human infection with avian influenza virus has been reported in China
A new case of human infection with highly pathogenic avian influenza H5N6 has been reported in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station, citing a notice from the Hong Kong health authorities, TASS reports.
The 68-year-old resident of Huizhou city in the southern province of Guangdong, who kept poultry in his backyard, has been infected with the virus.
His condition is assessed as critical by medics.
The first human infection with the H5N6 strain was reported in May 2014 in the southwestern province of Sichuan.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has reached 53.
In Brazil, citizens are required to present vaccination certificates when entering the country
In Brazil, the country's Federal Supreme Court (STF) judge Luis Roberto Barroso has ruled that visitors to the country must present a COVID-19 passport.
This is reported by CNN Brasil.
Citizens who have contraindications to vaccination are released from the requirement to present a vaccination certificate.
Also on the list of exceptions are those who have arrived from countries where proof of vaccination is lacking.
"The situation is even more serious if you consider that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year's, pre-Carnival and carnival parties, as well as other events, which means an increase in tourist traffic," Barbosa noted.
Previously, the Brazilian government had required unvaccinated coronavirus patients to observe a five-day quarantine.
The full protection scheme against COVID-19 has been revealed
A virologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Honored Scientist of the Russian Federation Anatoly Altstein in an interview with Ura.ru revealed the scheme of complete protection from the coronavirus infection.
He said this could be achieved by the introduction of an injection and the use of a nasal vaccine.
When given intravenously, large amounts of antibody A are formed. When the vaccine is injected, this does not occur.
Antibodies A protect the mucous membrane, so the virus cannot enter the body.
And inside, after vaccination, we have the most immunoglobulins G (antibodies).
And if you introduce both vaccines, you will get a lot of IgA and IgG antibodies. But there is no decision on double vaccination," the doctor explained.
The head of the Urals Federal District’s profilactologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences Sergey Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of the nasal vaccination combined with the injection is the possibility of no longer being a carrier of COVID-19.
He added that this would help to ensure that the body's defence is as strong as possible.
Earlier, the Minister of Health of Nizhny Novgorod Region David Melik-Guseynov stated that the new wave of the COVID-19 pandemic will be caused by the spread of the new coronavirus infection among children.
He said that such a picture is observed in other countries where the next wave of the pandemic has arrived earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I talked to the dog (he died a long time ago) like this - if you are ready to give up a warm home, a feeding, a kiss, love and games on a slippery slope, then go ahead.
But the pesel was trained and intelligent.
He chose my society and went home.
The video shows how it works in 90% of cases.
It wasn't taken from the ceiling, believe it or not.
I chased many of the owners to prevent them from running away, although they said, "Well, 200,000 run away (dachshunds), and I was taking them by the hand and pulling them in another direction."
In the end, 200,000 chose the owner, not the dog that ran away somewhere.
Mass protests against vaccination continue in Europe
More than 40,000 demonstrators took to the streets in the Austrian capital Vienna.
They expressed dissatisfaction with the restrictive measures and the government's plans to make vaccination against COVID-19 mandatory.
From next February, people who are not vaccinated will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
Spanish people angered by the government's health policy held a peaceful march in Madrid.
Some held placards with the message "This is a false pandemic", "I will not be vaccinated".
A large-scale protest against the sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, a COVID-19 certificate is required for access to bars, restaurants, sports halls, nursing homes and night entertainment venues.
The decision to introduce sanitary passports was taken in the wake of a rise in the number of coronavirus cases.
More than a thousand protesters protested against the tightening of restrictions and QR codes in Luxembourg.
The action began peacefully, but then turned into clashes with the police.
A group of protesters began throwing stones at the police.
In response, law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolay S. even in Wikipedia there is no consensus on this issue.
Kashevarova-Rudneva is also listed as “the first Russian doctor, doctor of medicine”, presumably because she started studying earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve that title.
But only Zharova agreed with him: Americans brought only death and plunder to any country they appeared in.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetrical coconut coir mattress on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is firm, with coconut shells on both sides.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs TFK.
Independent springs help to evenly distribute the load, and help the body to take on a natural shape.
The natural coconut is hypoallergenic, hygienic, and has excellent air circulation.
The natural Jacquard cover is dense, wear-resistant, and pleasant to the touch.
It's sad and lonely to age alone, but it's inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad to read about it.
A person should live as long as they can take care of themselves and not be a burden to anyone.
All the best.
The World Health Organization has already found "omicron" in dozens of countries
The World Health Organization (WHO) said that the new coronavirus strain "Omicron" has already been detected in 63 countries.
Several experts have already warned that the spread of the new strain could have catastrophic consequences.
The rate of spread of the strain was reported by the WHO.
According to the organization, the strain has already been detected in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it began to actively spread only from the end of November.
The WHO also expressed concern about the rapid spread of the new coronavirus variant.
Experts at the World Health Organization are concerned that the new strain, based on preliminary data, may spread faster than the "Delta" strain, which is the Indian variant of the coronavirus and is currently leading in all countries without exception.
Earlier, World Health Organization (WHO) Director-General Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus said the Omicron variant can have a significant impact on the course of the COVID-19 pandemic.
This was also the case in the UK.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that "omicron" will overtake "delta" in the near future.
But the number of people in Britain who have been infected is likely to be in the millions, with official figures currently standing at a few hundred, and estimates of up to 10,000.
British experts predict tens of thousands of deaths from the "omicron" strain, with more than 2,000 people a day being admitted to hospital.
The British health service will not be able to cope with this.
The situation is complicated by the fact that according to the latest studies, the effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower than that of other strains of the disease.
How Russian “Sputnik V” will react to “omicron” is unknown - this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has only just begun testing the Russian vaccine against the “omicron” strain.
Why do we need to see the stages of ageing?
It would be better to see the execution of your exercises in more detail.
It's not clear in the first exercise how to do it: sitting on the heels or standing on the knees, as written, but how to push the arms against the hips?
Or your hands on my breasts?
It's interesting, you're right, online communication is completely different, it's easy and relaxed, and when you meet in person, there's nothing to say.
And seeing a person, perhaps, is not what you expected, and it doesn't stick - that's where the attitude comes from.
When they meet their person, then their perspective changes.
And again, Soviet time is called “the devil’s time”.
Then people believed in God more sincerely than they do today.
And they were raised almost according to the laws of God (love of neighbor, do not steal and so on).
The ideology today is money at any cost.
Glaubers like Bolt have little to no faith (there's none at all), but even if there was, the devil's time has come in the 90s...
Our Petersburg, or rather, Leningrad, communal apartment with Big Zelenaya is still in contact.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we try to preserve the warm relations of the senior generation.
Perhaps this is due to the fact that there were no guests in the apartment, the rooms were not rented out, and the block brotherhood was not canceled.
Unfortunately, we see more and more at funerals.
Lara Angel, get out!
Human babies, especially males, are strong, mobile, energetic, playful, push, wrestle, fight, just like their little "cousins" in the wild!
Only that they are not as soft as puppies or kittens, so splinters, bumps, scratches are common, and there is no such thing as a boomerang!
And why?
Did Braithwaite not calculate the forces?
But you are always so sly that you never accidentally hurt anyone and never hurt yourself either?
The SkySleep Wave Space BS mattress is 150x185 cm.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BS) mattress has moderate firmness on both sides.
The comfort layers of the mattress - a combination of coconut shell and artificial latex with a relief surface - ErgoFoam.
The cover of the product is made of cotton, the fabric of Jacquard weaving.
It is durable, wear-resistant, and at the same time allows air to pass through without interfering with the ventilation of the mattress.
The cover is made of synthetic leather, which gives it a soft feel.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
Koyra coconut has antimicrobial properties, it is hard, and it evenly distributes the weight that falls on it.
The artificial latex mattress with a ribbed surface provides a micro-massage effect.
Durable materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnel spring block, in which the springs are connected to each other, is characterized by reliability, it can withstand large loads and is suitable for pairs with a small weight difference.
The product is reinforced with a PPU-made cover - it extends the service life of the mattress, protects the springs from deformation along the edges.
Israel's Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu announced the start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Ministry of Health will begin an emergency campaign to increase vaccinations on Sunday.
From 12 December, the coronavirus vaccine will be administered in schools throughout Israel.
The Prime Minister of the Jewish state, Naftali Bennett, at today's cabinet meeting stated that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose of citizens in the risk group will also be studied.
In Israel, mass vaccination of the population against the coronavirus infection COVID-19 began on December 20, 2020.
Israelis are being vaccinated with the Pfizer vaccine.
From January 10 last year, those who had been vaccinated began to receive their second dose.
The vaccination of adolescents aged 12 to 15 years in this country started in June this year.
Currently, more than 5.78 million people have received both doses of the vaccine, with the third more than 4.12 million citizens.
Anna Gauer, of course, will not crawl into a trap, it is PAUKOBRAZNOE, as Lyalya put it.
In any case, I don't see any fleas.
But I'm curious, is it really there?
He needs to be given something else to entice him
Dimax Genius 70x190 children's mattress
A children's two-sided mattress made of natural latex and natural coconut fibre based on an independent spring block EVS500.
A latex and coconut foam children's mattress on an independent spring block.
Natural latex is a soft, elastic material that is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic, and has excellent properties, making sleep as comfortable as possible.
The reverse side of the medium-firm mattress is comfortable, made of natural coconut fiber and latex.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs.
The springs are arranged in such a way as to evenly distribute the load over the mattress surface, supporting the body in its natural position.
A great option for school-age children and teenagers.
The cover is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant, and does not wear out.
Seven people died in Brazil as a result of the floods
At least seven people have died and 175 have been injured in the powerful rains that have hit the northeastern Brazilian state of Bahia and neighbouring Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS with reference to the rescue services.
A tropical cyclone is raging across the border of these states since the middle of the week, resulting in rainfall levels reaching 450 mm in the region. In 25 municipalities of the state of Bahia, a state of emergency has been declared, with flooding becoming the most destructive in 35 years.
Several bridges, two dams, and three roads have been destroyed.
According to the rescuers, about 5,700 people were left without shelter, and 6,700 were forced to leave their homes.
The damage caused by the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents.
Nika Lerman, I know Levomekol, I work with medicines.
It does a good job of reducing inflammation.
Personally, I prefer Bepanten for the regeneration of superficial wounds and scars, but it is more effective for you.
The main thing is that the healing process is going, such a hole was, just disgusting.
Hola, España, no me has escuchado y no me has entendido.
I will answer in the words of M. Isakovsky: "Birds fly over the sky\nThe past summer is looking for.
They fly to hot countries, but I don't want to fly, I want to stay with you, my native side!
I don't need other people's sun, I don't need other people's land."
And believe me, the photos from the park where I skied or my hometown will not be any worse.
It would be much more interesting to see your wonderful house with its interiors.
MAPED (France) Color'peps Twist, 12 colours, rotating, in plastic case.
A set of 12 bright wax candles in a plastic case with a screw-in stem.
They don't tear, they don't crumple, they're absolutely safe.
They don't require sharpening.
The body is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-pack: package with a sticker.
$135 billion went into apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, app user spending grew by 25% worldwide, and downloads grew by 8%.
The most popular video services in the world turned out to be various video services.
The most popular video editor was CapCut, and users spent the most time on YouTube.
And the number of applications downloaded and the amount spent by users showed a significant increase during the period from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads has increased by 8%, reaching 140 billion. User spending in apps has also increased significantly, by 25%, to a record $135 billion.
Such data was published by an analytical company App Annie, which published a report on the mobile app market in 2021.
In 2021, the global economy emerged from the lockdown and began a post-pandemic recovery.
"Will such a "return to physical" growth in the economy of applications slow down? Absolutely not," the authors of the report say.
India is the leader in terms of app downloads, accounting for about 20% of all downloads.
The United States (9%) and Brazil (8%) follow.
iOS users spent more than Android users: 65% of all app spending was on iOS.
CapCut, a video editor, topped the list of applications with the most downloads in 2021.
Following him are two Indian apps: video service MX TakaTak and the online shopping app Meesho.
Telegram also ranks in the top 10 in terms of the number of downloads.
In general, if you judge by the number of downloads, VPN services are popular among users (there are two of them in the top 10 - VPN Master and NightOwl VPN) and video-related services (besides CapCut and MX TakaTak, there are two more such services in the top 10 - Moj and SnackVideo).
"The most users spent in apps for live broadcasts and online streaming," the authors of the report noted.
YouTube is leading the pack, with TikTok, Disney+ and HBO Max also in the top five in terms of user spending, as well as the Japanese manga subscription service Piccoma.
Telegram, Instagram, Zoom and TikTok occupy the first places in the number of monthly active users, and the mobile version of Microsoft Office closes out the top 5.
In Russia, the leader in the number of downloads per year was the shopping app AliExpress.
Following him are the Zenly service, which shows the location of friends, and the same CapCut.
The top 10 apps include: StarMaker's online karaoke, Shein's online clothing store, the Minecraft PE Maps app, DiDi's online taxi ordering service, Pure Tuber's YouTube client, Dix's online store, and the Samokat online market.
People around the world have adapted to the pandemic by moving to mobile life, which can be considered one of the main conclusions.
The sectors that have helped people feel closer, both virtually and personally, have seen the greatest success," commented App Annie's Head of Marketing Research, Lexi Sidhu.
The mobile games sector generated $90 billion in revenue in 2021, with casual and hypercasual games leading the pack in terms of downloads.
The top three most popular games in the world are Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race.
In Russia, DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls and Phone Case DIY are the most popular games.
Previously, App Annie presented its forecast for 2022.
Among the main trends for next year, analysts at the company named the growth of the number of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the popularity of Generation Z financial applications, such as the Robinhood investment app, and the continued growth in popularity of metaverse mobile games.
Clan De File dog treats with beef, 30 pieces, 40 g each.
Natural, beef-based dog treats for all breeds and ages.
Clan De File is dog meat for dogs with beef, and nothing else.
All-natural dog treats for all breeds and ages.
Only one type of protein is used in the preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of food allergies, so it's a great treat for dogs with sensitive digestion and prone to allergic reactions.
The main ingredient of the product is a meat fillet processed in accordance with human grade quality standards, which are used in the preparation of food for humans.
Recommended daily ration: no more than 10% of an adult animal's daily ration.
Energy value: 407 kcal.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Nutritional value: protein 57, fat 17, fibre 4, moisture 20.
Russians warned about new scam
The perpetrators began to look for new ways to commit fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this with reference to experts.
According to the Director of Products at Ivideon, Zaur Abutalimova, the main danger associated with the spread of video communication tools is diphthongs.
In this case, fraudsters create fake videos based on real recordings of the victim.
Thanks to this, the neural network is able to accurately reproduce the characteristics of the behavior of a particular person.
Abutaliyev added that using deepfakes, criminals can call their victims on video chat or create a video with a copy of the person for the purpose of extortion.
"Such pranks can easily provoke bullying, as a skilled perpetrator can put people in embarrassing, dangerous or compromising scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis system engineer Alexander Vetkol also noted that people are more likely to trust others when they see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the event of video-based technologies.
David, I'll add.
What I wrote about is that I bought all of this in a small town where the local mentality didn't allow you to dress up or go out in short skirts, tights and socks.
It's a province, but there was such a product in the store.
In big cities and in Muslim countries, women would get their make-up done and show off their henna.
That's how it is in Dushanbe, it's a big city, the capital of the republic.
There are a lot of trends, but there is no such makeup.
Five actions to help avoid diabetes
High blood sugar levels are one of the most common problems worldwide.
However, some do not place much value on this, and that is a mistake.
Diabetes can eventually lead to serious complications and even death.
Preventive measures play a major role in preventing the formation of diseases.
For example, doctors recommend changing the diet - reducing the amount of various drinks and switching to plain water positively affects metabolism.
Sugary foods raise blood sugar levels to dangerous levels when eaten in excess.
Therefore, the first step on the path to a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and store them at home.
The appearance of the disease is not only affected by improper nutrition, but also by habits.
To reduce the risk of diabetes, it is necessary to move a lot.
Experts recommend following a low-carb diet.
Such a diet not only helps to lose weight, but also protects against sharp fluctuations in blood sugar levels.
To protect against diabetes, it is necessary to eat a lot of fiber.
Dietary fibers fill the stomach and thus contribute to the feeling of satiety, the secretion of digestive juices and the increased absorption of food.
Seeds of tomatoes Gavrish Pink Bush F1 0.10 g, article number 4241014.
A dwarf early-maturing beefsteak tomato with abundant fruit for outdoor and temporary polytunnel growing.
The plant is determinate, with short internodes.
The fruit is large, rich in red colour, quite dense, weighing 180-210 g and protected from sunburn by leaves, which store well.
The meat is juicy and sweet.
The hybrid is resistant to a complex of diseases.
It is recommended for making salads, appetizers and slicing.
Planting in the nursery: at the end of March - beginning of April.
The plot is in the first page of the first draft.
Planting out the seedlings in the greenhouses is in May.
After planting in the open ground, the plants form and are tied down.
MK Slavda FC-160.
This freezer has an A energy efficiency class, which means it consumes significantly less electricity when it is in use.
The freezer is suitable for both a private home and an apartment thanks to the use of high-quality quiet compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera works no louder than a regular refrigerator.
The quick freeze function freezes food quickly, preserving the maximum amount of nutrients.
The Slavda FC-160 freezer corresponds to the climate class N/ST, which allows it to work without problems at temperatures up to +38 degrees.
A digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Doctor Pavlova told about the “migraine of the day” for the workaholics
Several factors can worsen one's mood on the weekend
The cause of worsening of the patient’s condition after a busy day at work is often the “weekend hangover”, endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior research associate of the Faculty of Fundamental Medicine of the Moscow State University (MSU) and the head of the System Medicine Clinic, Zuhra Pavlov, told her Telegram channel.
According to her, migraine sufferers are especially often affected by this, who experience a headache, dizziness and weakness on weekends.
Doctor Pavlova noted that in addition to the accumulated fatigue from the week, there are plenty of objective reasons for the negative reaction of the body to the change in conditions.
On weekends, our lives are completely changed.
"We sleep for a long time, all day we lie on the sofa, we probably eat more and drink less, the doctor argued. "As a result of a lack of coffee, a small breakdown begins.
Because of overeating and lack of water - heavy and broken."
The late surge is also important.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you will experience a reaction called jet lag.
It arises in travellers who cross several time zones.
To determine which factor is playing a decisive role in worsening health, Pavlova recommended tracking what changes the most on weekends.
Mattress Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 130x185.
The reinforced perimeter of high-density foam significantly increases the service life of the mattress.
The mattress "Optimal Hard S1000" has different levels of firmness, the total height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum load on one bed is 140 kg.
The foundation of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is housed in its own tissue pocket, which allows for the proper distribution of body weight.
An insulating layer of wool was added to the spring block for added protection, separating the mattress fill and springs.
On one side, a layer of coconut coir, 2 cm thick, provides additional support and durability to the mattress.
A wool jacket, lined with artificial leather of 2 cm thickness and Hollcon 1 cm material, which provides additional comfort.
On the other side, the mattress has a layer of coconut fibre 1 cm thick and a layer of wool.
The fabric has been treated with a special antibacterial treatment, Sanitized (Sweden).
Fungicide completely destroys fungal spores, prevents the growth of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning, as well as air vents for additional ventilation.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine against omicron is ineffective
South Africa says Pfizer's Covid-19 vaccine against "Omicron" is ineffective
South African scientists have conducted a study and reported low efficacy of the Pfizer vaccine against the Omicron coronavirus strain.
According to estimates, it (the level of neutralization of the "omicron" variant) corresponds to (the level of) the effectiveness of the vaccine at 22.5% against the infection with symptoms, which is why... its ability to protect against infection is being questioned, the text of the study published on the MedRxiv portal says.
At the same time, specialists clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Previously, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the omicron variant of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in Britain, with more frequent hospitalizations than last year.
How much hidden sugar is in common products?
Sugar is not a good source of nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes, as well as cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that a hidden sugar may be listed under an unfamiliar word in a product's ingredient list - an ingredient similar to sugar in terms of calories, composition and glycemic index.
On the label, there may be several dozen names, essentially referring to sugar.
Some of the most common and frequently encountered names are glucose and fructose.
Other refined sugars include dextrose (sugar derived from corn), levulose (fruit sugar), molasses (black treacle), agave syrup, and others.
These are all simple sugars, which fall into the category of monosaccharides and disaccharides, and they can be found in confectionery, as well as ketchup, doctor's sausages, bread and more.
Rosca says that the most effective way to reduce sugar consumption is to eat whole and unprocessed foods, and to pay attention to labels and the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar differ in taste, but whatever the ingredient is in the product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it is still sugar.
It is difficult to calculate the exact amount of sugar, as it is necessary to take into account not only the amount of sugar stated by the manufacturer on the packaging, but also that vegetables, fruits and other things contain a certain amount of sugar.
As a result, the total amount of sugar may turn out to be significantly higher than indicated on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose importance for Germany in 25 years
The new German Chancellor Olaf Scholz said that the import of gas is losing its importance for Germany, as the country continues its transition to decarbonisation of the economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045, becoming a climate-neutral country.
"In 25 years, the question of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role," the chancellor said.
Scholz noted that Germany continues to maintain its commitment to Ukraine transporting Russian natural gas and in the future, as the resource is currently of great importance for the energy transition.
He recalled that Germany and the United States made a statement in which they confirmed their support for the energy transformation of Ukraine.
Previously, German Foreign Minister Annalena Baerbock stated that the certification process for the Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline is ongoing.
According to the minister, during the coalition negotiations and the discussion of the coalition agreement, it was stated that energy projects should be subject to European energy law.
The diplomat also noted that the pipeline does not meet the requirements of the European Union.
Thanks for the interesting photos!
In 1985, it was necessary to travel to those places.
I remember the Cathedral of Christ the Savior rising up from the Kazanokovo station, past the old building (resembling a power station, two-storey), along the Kazanokov Street, and turning right onto the Vavilova Street, towards the factory gates...
Hackers break into Twitter account of Indian PM
Hackers have breached the Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
The perpetrators managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India allegedly recognized bitcoin as a legal payment method, and that the country had already purchased cryptocurrency.
In Modi's office, they asked him to ignore the new messages.
Premier's representatives said that Twitter reacted quickly - access to the account was restored.
The page for the Indian premiere was hacked in 2020 and asked for donations to the fund using cryptocurrency.
A majority voted against independence in the New Caledonia referendum
In New Caledonia, the third referendum, held on December 12, ended with the same result as the previous two.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12, at noon, the majority of New Caledonian residents voted in favor of independence during the referendum.
At the same time, the level of participation in this third vote was significantly lower than in the previous two.
According to preliminary results published by local authorities, 3.51% (2,755 votes) voted in favor of independence for New Caledonia from France, while 96.49% (75,762 votes) voted against.
Turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 people voting in the election.
As reported by France-Presse, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt," as supporters of independence urged voters not to vote.
As initiators of the referendum, they opposed its holding on December 12, believing that the new outbreak of the COVID-19 epidemic on the archipelago would prevent a full and "honest" election campaign.
This abstention thus opened the way to the third victory of the supporters of French New Caledonia, after the referendums held in November 2018 and October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of the population voted against independence, and in 2020, 53.3%.
The separatists said they do not recognize the results of the last vote and will challenge them in the UN.
As reported on Sunday, December 12, at the Elysee Palace, President of France Emmanuel Macron is scheduled to address the results of this referendum.
The issue of New Caledonia's independence has been a major talking point in the French presidential campaign in recent weeks.
Several presidential candidates have expressed support for the territory remaining in France, as it is "the last outpost of the European Union in the Pacific Ocean."
"New Caledonia must remain French," repeated Eric Zemmour.
The Republican candidate Valérie Pécresse, who published a column in Le Figaro at the end of October, urged the Caledonians to remain French.
On the other hand, Emmanuel Macron announced in May 2018 that he would not take the position "because it is not his responsibility."
However, the president added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, for his part, expressed "a strong desire for the choice of the Caledonians to be the choice of France."
Hello, world!
I've been a little... I've been a little mean to you, I'm still a little embarrassed, I'm still a little sorry.
Thank you for not turning away from my channel.
On the subject: I'm not an artist, I love to draw, but I get inspired by a spontaneous flow.
But as a painter, he is not a painter: what can he change?
Just don't forget that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as widespread as it is now.
But medicine was at zero - leeches, garlic and decoctions.
Now, they would have put him back on his feet right away.
And the food has nothing to do with it.
The world’s first laser-equipped unmanned aerial vehicle was tested in Turkey
Successful tests of the world’s first drone with a laser weapon took place in Turkey.
The drone “Eren” was tested at a distance of 100 to 500 meters, reports “MIR24”.
The device is capable of neutralizing explosive objects at a distance using a laser.
The new model’s maximum flight altitude reaches 3,000 meters.
After passing the relevant tests, the Turkish military will put the drone into service, which will be used to destroy explosives without the need for sappers.
The agency stresses that Turkey is among the six countries in the world capable of developing and manufacturing their own drones.
I cut the steaks with a knife.
Salt, sugar, black pepper, and bay leaves.
Sometimes he added cloves, they don't bother.
He covered the deep bowl with a plate.
Well, anyway.
And why do I need this sturgeon for such money, I do not know what kind, the sturgeon is an excellent fish.
Bread, butter, and gherkins.
A soggy sandwich.
WSJ readers criticize Russia-US relations article
Readers of The Wall Street Journal criticized Professor Christopher Hartwell's article, in which he described his vision of relations between Russia and the United States.
The author expressed concern that the West is allegedly sacrificing Ukraine to Russia.
In his article, he convinces readers of the danger that comes from Moscow and made a number of insulting remarks about Russian President Vladimir Putin.
At the end, Hartwell called on the West to "stand together against Russia."
WSJ readers expressed their disagreement with the professor's position.
“There is a lot of false information in this article,” one of the readers quoted RIA Novosti as saying.
"Europe is not ours to lose, and Ukraine is not our land.
The United States and NATO will never go to war with Russia over Ukraine," another said.
Patches can also be applied to the lips.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch is a high-tech polymer that provides increased absorption and delivery of concentrated natural plant essence, which adheres tightly to the skin and gives a feeling of freshness.
When applied to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the associated loss of moisture and allows the essence to penetrate deep into the skin.
SONEX 2085/EL lamp with PDU Nores
The NORES 2085/EL series luminaire consists of a metal base (base) and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser material is high-quality white acrylic, which provides even diffusion and good light transmission.
The ceiling shape is square, in the form of a relief ornament with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent points, which give the included lighting a beautiful effect of "star twinkle" and flickering.
The IP43 degree of protection allows the use of the lamp in certain areas of wet rooms.
The kit includes a replaceable LED module with lenses, with a power of 72 watts, which corresponds to a 520-watt incandescent lamp.
And also a dimmer switch, which allows a smooth change in the color temperature from 3000 to 6000K, brightness adjustment, switching to warm/white/cold/night light modes.
Urjazh Maska for the face is a moisturizing thermal night 50 ml.
An ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types with a fresh, rested and glowing complexion in the morning!
The real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
Tonifies, smooths the skin's texture and restores the skin's barrier.
A very pleasant water-gel texture with no stickiness.
A great way to care for your skin after active sun exposure!
Hypoallergenic.
A magnitude 5.2 earthquake occurred in the Kuril Islands
An earthquake of magnitude 5.2 occurred near the Shikotan Island.
It is noted that the epicenter of the earthquake was located 231.8 km northeast of the city of Severo-Kurilsk.
The crater was located at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded an earthquake of magnitude 7.5 in Peru, in which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make it on his own, it's unknown where his petty-bourgeois thinking would have taken him.
It's great when you come to America as a famous person.
And you were born there, for what reason would you fight?
So why did he pollute the structure with filth, bile and poison, which no one has yet devised justice for?
Ukraine will start producing new generation of air-to-air missiles
The new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will start to create the ANKA-type reactive unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs).
On December 11, an independent adviser to the head of the Ukrainian president’s office, Aleksey Arestovich, reported this.
That is, they are capable of acting against air objects, against other drones.
Even against piloted aviation.
They will be equipped with Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the body and so on," Dialogue.ua quotes him.
Commenting on the main features of the ANKA drones, Arestovich said that they are about the reactive, not the piston-driven UAVs.
According to him, this new generation of drones surpasses Bayraktar in all respects.
The first batch of UAVs should be produced by the plant at the end of the next year, Arestovich said.
The ANKA aircraft was created by the Turkish Aerospace Institute in February 2014.
The drone was developed by Turkish authorities in collaboration with a number of private companies since 2010.
The Ukrainian General Staff has classified information on the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems during military operations of the joint forces in Donbas.
On December 6, President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky reported that the construction of a factory for the production of modern unmanned aerial vehicles had begun in the country.
He said that Ukraine is planning to use drones.
On September 29, Bayraktar Savunma and the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense signed an agreement to build a center in the Kyiv region, where personnel will be trained, and Bayraktar drones will be tested and serviced.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader called the memorandum “a big real step forward”.
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions escaped from the Singapore Changi Airport.
This was reported by The Straits Times.
The two predators managed to escape from the container with seven lions that had arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it is unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore, and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions lay down on the roof of a container.
The animals couldn't get away from him because of the protective netting that was set up nearby.
The standoff ended after the arrival of staff from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which manages all of Singapore's zoos.
They have immobilized the lions with tranquilizer darts and plan to transport them to a quarantine facility.
Earlier, it was reported that a lion escaped from its owner and roamed the streets of Phnom Penh, the capital of Cambodia.
On the same day, the beast voluntarily returned home, and no one was hurt.
Experts warn of cancer risk from B9 vitamin
Research suggests that an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, can lead to cancer.
The Daily Express has warned about this.
Experts say there is strong evidence that people who do not have a folate deficiency are less likely to develop certain types of cancer, in particular colorectal cancer.
However, exceeding the recommended dose can promote the growth of cancer cells.
University of Alabama Birmingham professor of nutrition Beth Kitchin advises tracking the amount of folate consumed throughout the day.
The optimal dose is 400 micrograms per day.
Cancer risk increases only if you significantly deviate from this number in either direction.
Kitchin recommends not taking B9 vitamins in tablets without a doctor's recommendation, and to monitor the dosage and avoid milk and other food products that contain folic acid.
Previously, nutrition consultant Rachel Fein called folate a substance that slows aging.
Since it is also found in avocados, Fine recommended that men over 50 eat this fruit more often.
In the UK, up to 75,000 people could die from the Omicron variant by April
British scientists predict that up to 75,000 people could die in England in the next five months if restrictions are not tightened in the winter.
The Guardian reported on this with reference to a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM), TASS reports.
According to the most optimistic forecasts of experts who are part of the British government's emergency situation advisory group, by April 2022, the country will record at least 25,000 deaths from the Omicron strain, and around 175,000 patients will be hospitalized.
At its peak, the hospital will be treating more than 2,000 infected people per day.
"Serious measures to combat the coronavirus may be required to prevent the National Health Service being overwhelmed if the Omicron variant turns out to be more transmissible than the Delta variant, and existing vaccines cannot prevent infection," said mathematician Rosanna Barnard from LSHTM.
The UK Health Security Agency previously warned that if the spread of the Omicron strain continued at its current rate, there would be around one million cases of infection by the end of the year.
By the middle of December, the Omikron strain could become dominant in the United Kingdom.
Currently, 1898 cases of the Omicron strain of coronavirus have been detected in the UK, of which 633 were detected in the last 24 hours.
At the same time, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health, Sajid Javid, stated that in reality, this figure could already reach 10,000 cases.
She wanted to write a smart comment, but she got to this point:
"The suffering endured by the animal and its subsequent employment in a second job."
And under the table fell!
Turns out the "unfortunate animal" is a man, and I thought a squirrel!
The last knight on this planet.
Richard Kraj, judging by the dislikes, is expressing ideas that are not very accessible to most people.
What were you thinking - that those on Instagram are pretending or they are all doing well, since there is no point in pretending?
The Z is like a junk yard, all the things that didn't make it out of the factory are here.
If you set out to find it and dig hard enough, you can find something worth keeping among the trash.
You just need to be patient and clearly understand what you are looking for.
The superyacht market has grown by a quarter in the world
The construction of superyachts this year and orders for next year are breaking all records, despite calls to reduce carbon emissions and fight climate change.
The world fleet of yachts has 1200 units, which is 25% more than last year.
It is hard to imagine that the number of people who want and can afford to buy a floating palace for £50 million or more will decrease, writes The Guardian.
However, there are more and more of them.
This year, 25% more ships were ordered than in the previous year.
Brokers say there has not been such a frenzy on the market in 20 years.
The first reason is that many who can afford a yacht fear contracting the disease on land and prefer to avoid the pandemic on board their own vessel.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
Previously, all of these people would go to the office and meet with business partners in person, but now the vast majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are conducted over the phone.
Broker Will Christie told the paper that the shipyards are taking orders for new yachts for 2025 and beyond.
This means that customers are willing to pay more, just to have their yacht ready at least a year or two sooner.
"People just want freedom, and the super-rich can afford it," he says.
In western society, many people criticize such behaviour and call it decadent.
The rich, say sociologists, do not want to understand that in times of hardship, travel to space, life on yachts or flights on one's own planes provoke irritation in society, since the elite does not want to share the responsibility for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are urging governments to act and are proposing new taxes and rules for the super-rich, though they realise it will be hard to implement.
However, only the number of super-yachts ordered is impressive, but also their characteristics.
Of the 1200 ships, 27 have a length of the stern greater than 100 meters.
The Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the REV Ocean yacht, which is 183 meters long.
After launch, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht has a "lunar pool" and a submarine designed for exploring the depths of the ocean.
Existing superyachts have become platforms for helicopters, open-air cinemas, and some of them, such as the yacht of the fighter McGregor, a platform for martial arts. Professor of economic anthropology at the University of Indiana Richard Wilk says that compared to the total number of carbon emissions from fossil fuels, the carbon footprint of the super-rich is insignificant.
But it has symbolic value if you consider that there are only about 2000 multimillionaires in the world.
This is just another example of the overconsumption of a very small group of people.
Scientists found that the emission trail of the billionaires is a thousand times greater than the average person's footprint on the planet.
If one person produces an average of 5 tonnes of CO2 per year, then Roman Abramovich is responsible for 33.9 tonnes of greenhouse gases that entered the atmosphere in 2018.
At the same time, two-thirds of the emission trail adhered to the yacht Eclipse, which is 162.5 meters long.
Even if the owner is not on board the yacht, the crew continues to poison the planet.
The owner can call the captain and give the order to tow the yacht, for example, from the Mediterranean Sea to the Caribbean.
The owners of superyachts are not sympathetic to other people when they complain through YouTube that there is no place for their giant ships to dock.
It is also difficult to understand her appeal to build marinas for ships of 50 metres.
A dangerous weekly alcohol dose linked to colon cancer
American scientists have determined what volume of alcoholic beverages in a week increases the risk of developing cancer.
This is reported by the Daily Express newspaper.
Experts concluded that consuming four or more alcoholic drinks per week is associated with an increased risk of cancer.
In this case, the likelihood of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
Moreover, moderate drinkers have a higher risk of colorectal cancer than women.
The exact cause of this type of cancer is not known, but researchers note that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the body.
Thanks to the author for the quality material and photo.
Sergey, I don't see anything wrong with egoism and pride.
Just like you can't see the narcissism and pride in the cuckold who is looking for a free surrogate mother to shift the expenses and responsibility onto her, while enjoying the title of father from a safe distance.
Why they work in the ministry, they have a place in the circus.
I understand that everything should have been done with royal flair, but the model is very over-the-top.
It is difficult to imagine how poor Diana was crammed into the carriage, and in general, any movement.
I was 12 years old and I remember watching the ceremony on TV.
It seemed like almost all the girls dreamed of being princesses in beautiful, fancy dresses, and I was no exception.
But looking at that dress, I decided I wasn't going to be a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old child
Many, or rather all dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they don't realize how developed the four-legged pets are.
For many years, biologists have conducted various experiments to determine the intelligence of animals.
Although a dog's vocabulary is not as extensive as a human's, a new study shows that dogs can respond to 89 words or phrases.
The work of the scientists was published in the publication Sciencealert.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they can't understand politics, economics or the arts, but they often manage to fool their owners.
Experts believe that certain breeds show the best results in understanding human language, but there is not enough statistical data to draw firm conclusions.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered canine geniuses - such as Labrador Retrievers.
Scientists have concluded that dogs are capable of logical thinking, and their ability to learn is not inferior to that of a two-year-old child.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
The mattress has a TFK spring block with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made on the basis of the independent TFK block.
This is a reliable modern construction with 512 independent springs for the bed.
Each spring is in its own pouch and has no effect on the neighbouring ones.
In this way, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
The person takes on a natural form during sleep.
The springs are insulated from the upper layers of the thermal insulation with a foil.
The top layer is made of natural latex and coconut, which have excellent and beautiful properties.
One side is covered with a thin layer of natural seven-zone latex.
This natural filler has 7 comfort zones, which helps to perceive the weight of a person, has a light massage effect.
The Antistress cover is made from velvet, which is 250 g per square metre.
It is pleasant to the touch and externally, it has calming, relaxing properties.
Sova, a shining example, is the deep-sea diver Taumaitih Aksel.
Some of his victims are so great that they become the cause of the joker's death.
He can't swallow them, and his teeth won't let him spit out too much back into the water.
If you don't care about the fate of your four properties, why did you decide that someone will be interested in them and will take care of them?
Today, the law allows you to manage your property.
Do it yourself if you don't like how others are doing it.
Ukraine is ready for trade with the United States and Russia
The United States and Russia will “trade” over Ukraine’s entry into NATO, said analyst Alexander Kochetkov in his article for the publication “Glavred”.
According to him, Washington and Moscow are planning to continue negotiations on the guarantees of the United States regarding the fact that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Alliance, despite the words of the American leader Joe Biden about the right of countries to "go wherever they want".
If you are offered something that is clearly unacceptable, for example, to sell a close relative into sexual slavery, you will not engage in trade, but simply report the offerer.
And in relation to Ukraine, a trade is expected," the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia is not planning to attack Ukraine, but is seeking dialogue with Kiev.
"The training is carried out secretly, quickly and immediately moves to offensive actions, not waiting for the group to be discovered and to deploy forces of counteraction," he noted.
China stimulates the development of the railway industry
Advanced Chinese technologies attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Railway Transport and Equipment Exhibition, which was held in the city of Chuzhou, in the province of Hunan /Central China/.
The core technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co. Ltd. allow the trains to automatically detect and diagnose technical faults, said Mr. Hou Zhaowei of the company.
High-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, which will ensure increased reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
In the past six months, China has significantly increased its exports of railway transport equipment, and many countries in Asia and Europe are witnessing the "Chinese speed".
In May this year, the company CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd. rolled out the first two-story high-speed electric trains designed in China for export to Europe.
With a maximum speed of 200 kilometres per hour, these trains will run on the railways of Austria, Germany, Hungary and other European countries.
In November, the trial operation of the metro train developed by the aforementioned company for Turkey began.
The train will run along the metro line connecting the centre of Istanbul with the city's airport.
The metro line in this direction will open next year.
It will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 kilometres per hour.
"China's railway equipment manufacturing industry is one of the industries with the highest level of innovation and the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Fan Yajian, head of the Trade and Investment Department of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade /CCPIT/.
"This industry is the main competitive advantage of Chinese high-end equipment production on the global market," said Fan Yajian.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has created a leading system for the production of railway equipment, with a full range of auxiliary equipment and large-scale production.
According to Fan Yaozan, the country ranks first in terms of electrification of railways and in terms of operating mileage on high-speed and urban railways.
The biologist listed early signs of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semen Goloshchikin in conversation with Radio Sputnik listed the early signs of dementia.
According to him, the signs of dementia may include forgetfulness, as well as a number of mild cognitive impairments, such as difficulty concentrating, planning, and lowering the level of abstract thinking.
Currently, there is a discussion about whether hearing loss can be an early sign of Alzheimer's disease or a risk factor for its development, a specialist said.
Goloshinkov stressed that the causes of dementia can be neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, certain infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and atherosclerosis of the brain's blood vessels were the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that to date, doctors do not have any effective treatments for dementia.
Therefore, it is necessary to start its prevention in time.
He said that learning foreign languages and engaging in active conversation would help to reduce the risk of dementia.
The WHO also recommends maintaining moderate physical activity, regularly training cognitive skills with games and hobbies that require intensive use of memory and logical thinking
"There are recommendations for the use of various BAs, but their effectiveness and appropriateness are still being discussed in the scientific community," said Goloshchekin.
"The World Health Organization recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regular training of cognitive skills and abilities through games and hobbies that require intense involvement of memory and logical thinking," said Goloshukin.
Earlier, the British charity Alzheimer's Research UK said that the disease is increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
The doctors said the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be vision problems, which cause the patient to have trouble recognizing objects.
Another sign of developing dementia is aphasia, a condition in which a person is unable to find the right words to express what they want to say.
The neurologist demanded that Saakashvili be sent abroad for treatment
Former President of Georgia Mikheil Saakashvili needs psychological and rehabilitation treatment abroad, said neurologist Otar Toidezi, who is part of the advisory board of doctors created by the ombudsman of Georgia.
His neurological status is the leading cause of his illness.
The stable problems are movement, coordination, and character variability," the specialist said, noting that this does not exceed the norm and now the ex-president needs to be sent for special rehabilitation.
"We call this neurorehabilitation and psychoneurorehabilitation, which we do not have in Georgia," Toidze said, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a special facility, which does not exist in Georgia.
On December 7, Saakashvili began to sabotage medical care after the penitentiary service disciplined him.
The Georgian politician quickly managed to overturn the punishment and regain his former rights.
Aleksandra, "Are you also taking money for this?" - I'm interested to know where these people come from...
For bread in the bakery you pay normally, but for the tutor's work you don't?
Or are we so holy that we are nourished by the breath?
There is another side to the medal.
These people are parasites on society.
They don't work, they don't pay taxes, they live on benefits and from their relatives.
In addition, they receive full medical care.
How many mouths can a working person feed?
We feed all the alcoholics, drug addicts who have also lost their health due to their stupidity.
Then we are surprised by the extension of the pension age.
These sums could have been spent on treating real patients.
Of course, the red flag of Victory will forever remain in the history of our country and should not be mixed with the state flag.
The red flag has a reverse side, it is a symbol of the communist movement, so it will never be a state flag again.
It is time to stop writing provocative articles, it is time to get red-faced and start living a normal life, not the past.
Protests against COVID passports took place in Spain
Protests against mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificates have taken place in the Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, Europa Press reports.
In the Catalan capital, the number of participants in the action was approximately 3,000.
In Barcelona, COVID passports are now required to visit bars, restaurants, sports facilities, nursing homes and night clubs.
Many of the protesters came to the demonstration without masks.
Their placards accused the government of totalitarianism and urged people to respect the will of the people.
In Valencia, a vaccination passport will also be required for entry into entertainment venues and restaurants with a capacity of more than 50 people.
Protesters in this city have declared a medical dictatorship, and the vaccination has been called an experiment.
In Spain, more than 5.2 million cases of coronavirus infection have been detected since the start of the pandemic, more than 88,000 patients have died.
In Russia, it is also planned to introduce restrictions for the unvaccinated.
The government introduced draft laws on a unified QR code system into the State Duma on November 12.
It is assumed that Russians will be able to visit places of mass events, cultural institutions, public catering and retail outlets with the presentation of either a vaccination certificate or a medical record of vaccination.
The same rules will be established for travel by trains and planes.
Jarovnya Tradition Anthracite 26 cm cast iron with glass lid.
The coating is cast iron with an anti-stick coating of Anthracite TM Tradition.
The pot is designed for daily use in the home.
The anti-slip coating, which is as hard-wearing as natural stone, has been specially developed for intensive use every day.
A thick-walled cast body.
A five-layer non-stick coating of the latest generation.
Premium coverage, enhanced by mineral particles.
Two layers of extra protection against the suburbs.
It has good non-stick properties for easy and pleasant preparation of healthy meals without oil and fat.
At least 4000 cycles of preparation, with proper maintenance.
Suitable for all types of tiles, except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The warranty for each item is 4 years (provided that the rules of operation are followed for 4 years for the body and 1 year for the anti-corrosive coating).
They do not contain PFOA, LEAD, or CADMIUM.
Cast iron pots and pans can be used in the oven without a glass lid.
Ease of cleaning.
Logic would dictate that the virus is constantly changing.
If a person is healthy and only gets sick a few times a year (once or twice a year with the common cold), then their immunity is normal.
Immunomodulators are not recommended for prophylaxis in principle, any doctor will tell you.
Immunity is supported by healthy eating and a plus exercise regime.
In this case, vaccination against the flu and this coronavirus is pointless.
The 3M 5925 particulate filter.
FFP2 level of protection, 2 pieces.
Article No. 713946.
A filter cartridge for 3M 6000, 3M 7500 and full-face masks 3M.
Protects the user's respiratory tract from various substances in the air.
Creates a reliable barrier against infectious particles.
This filter is designed for operation in conditions where the concentration of harmful substances in the ambient air exceeds the permissible level.
A filter can be used to protect against bacteria/viruses together with, for example, essential oils and other antibacterial agents.
The FFP2 class of protection has a PD value greater than 0.05 mg/m3, with a maximum contaminant concentration of 12 times the PD value.
This class of respirators can retain at least 94% of harmful substances.
The prefilters are attached to the gas masks with the 3M 501 holder.
Features: low resistance to breathing.
It's not difficult to review.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half-face masks and full-face masks 3M.
Compatibility with other PPE required in difficult working conditions is ensured.
The "constitutional monarch's" eyes, according to the Internet, did not only get me.
And this family PR - children, father...
Reva seemed to me to be some kind of nothing.
He only knew that Zaitsev was annoying - Zaitsev, Zaitsev.
Well, I found out, said it once, and kept quiet, let my friend show himself, and that's why we fought.
A steep climb: how the Chinese are becoming skiers
The Olympics should attract millions of people to the slopes and help create international-level resorts in the country
In China, they hope that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to take up winter sports, which will help President Xi Jinping collect 1 trillion yuan, but also help to boost the economic development of backward and remote provinces.
The ski resort of Taivu in Zhangjiakou, located near the site of the Winter Olympics, is becoming increasingly popular with Chinese people.
In addition to building infrastructure in the region, work is being done to plant trees: workers plant trees.
There are more than 700 ski resorts in the country, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international competitions.
In many regions of China, where resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou, there are problems with snow.
The main goal for the long-term perspective is to provide comfortable and interesting holidays in Chinese resorts so that all newcomers become regular visitors.
However, this is still a long way off.
Olympic adviser Justin Downs says the Chinese ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
More and more Chinese people are going to the slopes in winter.
Fiona, a Beijing snowboarder, is one of them.
Despite the major changes, it will take many more years to create a ski culture here, says Downs.
Many resorts are located in agricultural and mining areas.
These regions still need to be actively developed and create the necessary infrastructure for rest.
70-year-old Gao Makong lives in Chunli, near the site of the Winter Olympics.
He notes that there has been a boom in winter sports tourism in recent years.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was built from Beijing to Chunli, and now none of the local residents suffer from unemployment.
More and more shops are opening up in the country that sell clothing and equipment for winter sports.
On the slopes, they open restaurants with national cuisine dishes.
There is even a COVID-19 testing station in Taipei now.
China is striving to create a prosperous winter sports industry, and its athletes should become the leaders of the world's largest international competitions, and the resorts and equipment should reach the world's level.
More than 500 million people around the world could face extreme poverty due to the pandemic, the World Health Organization has said.
More than 500 million people around the world could be plunged into extreme poverty due to the coronavirus pandemic, which has stalled progress towards universal health coverage, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank said.
In observance of the 12 December International Day of Universal Health Coverage, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank have published two complementary reports.
They concluded that the pandemic has led to disruptions in primary care, excessive strain on the health care system.
In this regard, for the first time in 10 years, the coverage of the population with immunization has decreased, and the mortality from tuberculosis and malaria has increased.
The WHO and the World Bank stressed that the pandemic has caused "the worst economic crisis since the 1930s, so people are finding it harder to pay for treatment."
This situation is pushing more than 500 million people into extreme poverty, because they have to pay for these services out of their own pockets.
In October, United Nations Secretary-General António Guterres said that the coronavirus pandemic has plunged more than 100 million people into poverty, and more than four billion people have almost no social support.
Makita KP0810
Official Makita dealer.
The powerful motor is ideal for drifting.
Lightweight and great balance.
The use of both standard and bi-directional mini-levers.
A simple system for quick installation of blades.
A new ergonomic design of the body, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce the action of vibrations on the user's hands.
Three V-shaped grooves for removing different sized fascias.
The dust removal system is a choice: left or right.
Wife, this is the pelt of a weasel.
It's awful.
The flying mice have already been gorged on pangolins, and the jellyfish have begun to take their toll.
Oh, how many more wonderful discoveries the moles, the lemmings, and the bog-moths can make for us.
Taiwan minister cut off from 'Democracy Summit' call by White House
The minister of digital technology of Taiwan, Audrey Tang, gave a speech at a panel discussion at the US-organized "Democracy Summit" and the recording of the summit on YouTube shows that her speech was switched to audio-only.
Reuters, citing sources, said the image was pulled down by the White House.
According to their report, the reason was that the map showed Taiwan as a separate color from China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map, which Ms Tan showed, was compiled by the South African civil society organisation CIVICUS and ranked countries according to their level of civil rights.
Taiwan was designated green as "open," while China, North Korea, Laos and Vietnam were designated red as "closed."
After the minister showed the map, the picture on her side was replaced with a screenshot with the note that "the opinions of the participants do not necessarily reflect the position of the U.S. government."
China was not invited to the "Democracy Summit".
Reuters sources noted that the map shown by the Taiwanese minister was at odds with Washington's "One China" policy.
One source in the agency said that after the map was released, the National Security Council of the United States angrily contacted the State Department, accusing it of showing Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-organized "Democracy Summit" was held from December 9 to 10 with the participation of representatives of 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society organizations and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
During the “zero day” of the summit, the Nobel Peace Prize laureate, the editor-in-chief of the Novaya Gazeta newspaper, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international fund through which money obtained through corruption could be donated to charity.
Earlier today, the deputy secretary of the Russian Security Council, Yury Averyanov, stated that the summit was “anti-Russian and anti-Chinese charge”.
They serve you information as if they were preparing food, but there is always rotten meat everywhere, and the butcher has the last piece of meat left.
Classic journalism is creating a story out of nothing.
They boil the meat, but not the meat, but the hooves and hoofs, and get a substance like glue.
The finished product looks like a yellow translucent strip, almost odorless and hard like plastic, used as natural gelatin.
In fact, the amount of harmful substances from the processing of waste is no more than from its decomposition.
But this saves companies a lot of money.
Therefore, a fairy tale about ecology was invented for the lochs, who are also working on collecting garbage for free in the idea.
My personal contribution to the environment is to refuse unnecessary purchases and long-term use of things.
If I go beyond the boundaries - I do not throw away, but donate to charity.
Football shorts Jogel Camp Jfs-1120-016, white/black (XL).
Description: The football shorts are perfect for playing football and doing sports.
Shorts have a straight, convenient cut.
The wide strap combined with the adjustable strap provides a comfortable fit.
The fabric has high strength, durability, lightness and good air permeability, meeting the requirements of any level of play.
The updated brand logo is on the left side.
Shorts are packaged in a convenient multi-use, snap-closure pouch.
Stylish design, straight cut, wide belt with a buckle, durable and long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Features.
Go into specialties that allow you to work online.
We have many people who are squeezed because they work for their uncle, but abroad.
But because of the difference in currencies, this is advantageous for us.
Compared to other countries, we are still poor.
Of course, you will have to learn different tricks, but... the network allows you to be independent of the local labor market.
But our country is not creating any jobs.
And what you create, you won't get paid for.
The dining set "Egoist-unity" with gold plating (4 items).
The “Royal Childhood” collection is one of the largest and most famous collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It contains many beautiful models of silver cups, spoons and knives, trinkets and trinkets, hunters and cups.
All children's silver items are subject to strict quality control.
The eco-silver produced directly on the factory, meticulous hand-polishing with wooden rollers makes the products absolutely safe for children.
Regular use of silver devices can support the body's natural immunity and even prevent some common childhood illnesses.
The factory's specialists received a grant to use a complex but very beautiful technique of guillotining, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This allowed for the creation of incredibly vivid and three-dimensional images on the products.
The collection is full of adorable characters that will become the child's loyal friends.
Inka Belka, everything will be fine.
There is another easy one.
The lung tissue regenerates well if all of it is removed, but the remaining portion will expand.
If it is a pneumonectomy, then the second lung will become larger over time and will work for two people.
Try to breathe deeply, fathers are stronger than daughters, their tears do not please them.
Don't cry before time.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made suborbital flight
The New Shepard spacecraft from Blue Origin, with six tourists on board, made a suborbital flight on Saturday, 11 December.
The journey, which was broadcast on the company’s website, lasted for more than ten minutes, after which the capsule with the passengers landed on Earth, TASS reports.
The launch of the rocket was carried out from the launch pad in the vicinity of the American city of Van Horn (Texas).
The ship rose to an altitude of about 100 km, and the space tourists found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The rocket itself landed on the launchpad as planned.
Blue Origin successfully completed its first suborbital flight with passengers on board on July 20.
ZARISOVKIS OF DEREVSKOY MOSCOWICH.
Don't lump them all together - bad people are out there, and you may have claims against them for a specific reason...
But what does this have to do with the number of children, age, pension fund and so on?
Write that they are "thieves who did not return the money."
But how many and when to have children is not your business, until they gather these children to hang you from your neck.
If that is the case, then what right do you have to condemn them?
Well, it's probably only in education...
The chosen (themselves) parents dictate their own rules, openly disregarding the existing ones.
And if this applies to other areas of life, such as the judicial system and so on?
For them, the laws are not written.
And if the father were to implement his method of upbringing and education?
It's a bad example for other people.
The embroidery set "Furry stars" DESIGN WORKS 2719.
Contents: 14ct Aida cloth in dark blue, perle cotton, sequins, beads, pins, pattern, instructions.
Design Works has been in production since 1987 and is popular worldwide.
Many of the motifs have been developed by the renowned designer Ronald West.
The Design Works cross-stitch kits are equipped with high-quality Aida fabric, 100% cotton floss and a No. 24 embroidery needle.
You will also find sets for plastic canvas embroidery, Tobin embroidery - this is embroidery on napkins, tablecloths and other things.
China strengthens prevention and control of COVID-19 in cities where land border checkpoints are located
The joint prevention and control mechanism of the State Council of the People's Republic of China issued a circular requiring the strengthening of prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities where land border checkpoints are located in order to further prevent the import of the virus from abroad.
According to the circular, people leaving the mentioned cities must provide a negative nucleic acid test result obtained within 48 hours before departure.
Those arriving in cities where land border checkpoints are located must present at least one COVID-19 nucleic acid test on arrival.
The document states that these requirements will be in effect until the relevant provincial administrative units determine and publish the zones of the specified cities until March 15, 2022.
In addition, it is noted that cities where land border checkpoints are located and which meet certain conditions may consider the possibility of creating buffer zones for the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic within their jurisdiction.
Taisya Sokolova, as usual, draws Russian women to the East by Indian films, which are only shown in cinemas in Russia.
In the west, nobody was looking at this rubbish with the natives.
And how many of these towns and villages have been forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Vivre Castom family, 140x195, article: 5110704.
The layers of the RelaxFoam mattress are 2 cm: aloe-latex, 2 cm: coconut, 2 cm: aloe-latex, 2 cm: RelaxFoam.
The cover is a three-piece Splendid swimsuit.
The cotton fabric has a special design.
The foundation is woven with special synthetic threads that provide special strength and softness to the material.
The cellular structure of the weave supports natural thermoregulation and moisture wicking during sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, density 230 g/m2.
Dimax Ok Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The orthopedic mattress OK Basis is one of the most affordable models in the range.
The Balance Foam mattress provides all the necessary orthopedic properties, but at a budget price.
This product is an optimal combination of price and quality.
Pen Balance is a modern material that is made from PPU.
The filler is hypoallergenic and safe.
That is why the ink is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate obtained in Europe, which is much stricter than Russian requirements.
Another important quality of the Balance Foam is its orthopedics: the material supports the correct position of the body throughout the night.
Thanks to the pen, the mattress gained a medium level of firmness, so the product is considered to be soft by the manufacturer.
The main carrying block in the mattress is SuperSprings.
It is notable for the independent springs, here there are 256 elements per square metre.
The practical block can withstand up to 100 kg on a sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, improving the orthopedic qualities of the mattress.
The manufacturer offers the option of choosing between a 12 cm and 18 cm spring block without changing the final price.
Please specify your preferences when ordering the operator of the store.
The mattress is supplied in a knitted cover, together with it the height of the model is 21 cm.
The cover is non-removable.
Orthopedic foam used in mattresses has CertiPUR certification.
The Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG from the Arte Lamp manufacturer.
It would be perfect for a room like a living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
The light-emitting device is provided in color: gold.
The chandelier uses E14 light bulbs.
The total power allows to illuminate approximately 2 m2.
The manufacturer recommends this lamp for rooms decorated in the "Classic" style.
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs has reported on the “sad conclusion” of relations between Russia and the United States
The deputy head of the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Sergey Ryabkov, in an interview with Izvestia, assessed the prospects of relations between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that the long process of interaction has led to tragic conclusions, and the problems between the two countries began not yesterday.
One-sided negative predictability is there, but in terms of some sort of improvement in relations, it is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion after a long journey we've been on with the current administration, with Trump, and with Obama.
The problems started not yesterday," the diplomat said.
According to Ryabkov, the problems are due to the US's efforts to impose its approaches on Russia on a number of issues.
The deputy head of the Foreign Ministry added that he would not have dared to give optimistic forecasts about the prospects for improving relations and did not expect Washington to change its position.
He explained that progress is not being seen in areas such as strategic stability and cyber security.
Russia, meanwhile, is calling on the United States to take a responsible approach to international security and hopes that the signals will be heard and that Americans will listen to the reasoned arguments.
Earlier, Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov stated at a meeting with US Secretary of State Antony Blinken that Moscow is ready to resume dialogue with the United States.
Virologist warns of COVID nasal vaccine risks outside hospitals
People who have been vaccinated against COVID-19 by the nasal vaccine may develop an allergy and require medical assistance, so it is not advisable to set up vaccination points in airports and shopping centres.
This was reported by TASS, a Russian news agency, by a virologist, a corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences and the head of the Laboratory of Bionanotechnology, Microbiology and Virology at the Novosibirsk State University, Sergey Netesov.
It is easier to set up vaccination points for the intranasal vaccine in airports and shopping centres, but I would only do this initially in medical facilities.
The risk of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine is low, but it is better to stay close to the doctor's office afterwards.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy drugs that work literally within minutes-two, which is sometimes very important," Nechaev said.
According to the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccination in shopping malls when there is experience in using the drug.
He also stressed that when using a nasal vaccine, it is important that it reaches the mucous membrane in the nasal cavity.
However, there is a possibility that the vaccine will not reach its destination if the person who is vaccinated sneezes after the injection.
The painting numbers on the wall, the anime "The Sword that Slays Demons" 5426 40x60.
Do you want to feel like a real artist?
The numbers are interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many love to draw, but sometimes lack the skills or abilities.
This is a simple but very engaging activity that allows you to relax, unleash your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
The assortment has many unusual pictures and "off-the-beaten-track" plots!
We develop topical stories ourselves and try to make the result surprise you!
It's all very simple!
When painting the outlines on the canvas, they do not "float", they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered to avoid getting lost in the colours.
The picture in its finished form will become a bright element of the decor, an eye-catcher of the interior, attracting attention from the first glance.
But this picture was not painted by some artist.
You drew her yourself.
With their own hands!
Serbia produced 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine
The most popular vaccine in Serbia is the “Sputnik V” vaccine.
Serbia produced about 2 million doses of the Russian vaccine Sputnik V, Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of the country Nenad Popovic told TASS.
"The State Institute of Torlak has produced around 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine so far, and we expect to produce at least 4 million more in the coming period," Popovic stated.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
In this regard, the republic plans to purchase another million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
The Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of Serbia also expressed interest in the production of the nasal vaccine "Sputnik V" and the drug "Sputnik Light" in the country.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin has reported that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of its own coronavirus vaccine, Sputnik V, to Serbia.
The faithful are said to make up the church.
We can't know if they are true believers or not.
Each of us would like to be a true believer, and each strives to be one.
But no one should speak of themselves or of those who believe as they do that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say that they are true believers, then they can say the same of others.
The Benartti Prime Orto S1000 145x190 mattress.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different firmness sides, with a total height of 22 cm.
The maximum load on one bed is 150 kg.
The foundation of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is housed in its own fabric pocket, which allows the springs to properly distribute the body's weight.
An insulating layer of wool was added to the spring block for additional protection, separating the mattress filling and springs.
On one side of the mattress, there is a layer of coconut coir of 3 cm height, which provides additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
On the opposite side of the mattress, a layer of coconut coir 3 cm and natural latex 1 cm was added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made from hemp jacquard, which is printed on an eco-friendly material called Hollcon.
The fabric has been treated with a special antibacterial treatment, Sanitized (Sweden).
Fungicide completely destroys fungal spores, prevents the growth of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning, as well as air vents for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress is additionally reinforced with a frame made of artificial leather, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., Please remind me, what style did the marathon at the 2021 World Championships take place in?
You can see the ski slope, on which the participants of the race should finish in the classic style?
Attention, the question is what is Klebo doing to the right of Bigunov and how he wants to get to the slope if he was turning back before the tree?
And the "best finisher" at 1.5 km and after 50 km are two different things.
It's been a long time...
I was, in fact, not even a driver.
He had rights, but he didn't know how to drive.
They proposed to drive 250 km in one direction!
Young, bad, agreed.
The host is nearby, drinking water, I am eating.
First, as king, he occupied the center!
A column formed behind me.
Missed.
Then the belt on the GUR broke.
Then we were stopped by the police.
The column was organized, and their car broke down.
It needs to be pulled.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk, and the driver was inexperienced.
And what kind of drunk is he?
Don't trip, don't fall.
Ahead of us with the blinkers on!
I don't think it comes out of advertising, it hurts him.
Pevtsov is saying the same thing: about the return of the pension age.
The budgets have already been adjusted to take into account the billions of dollars that have been left unpaid by pensioners.
Who is telling them this?
In the UK, 1239 cases of the Omicron coronavirus strain were recorded in one day - RT in Russian
In the UK, 1,239 cases of infection with the new omicron strain of the coronavirus have been identified in one day.
Sky News is reporting this.
In particular, 1,196 new cases of the "omicron" strain were recorded in England, 38 people were infected with the new variant in Scotland, and five in Northern Ireland.
The total number of people infected with the new strain of COVID-19 in the UK has reached 3,137.
Previously, scientists at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that up to 75,000 people in England could die from the coronavirus outbreak caused by the "Omicron" strain by April.
Peskov warned about the suffering of western countries that are introducing anti-Russian sanctions
The press secretary of the President of the Russian Federation, Dmitry Peskov, commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the event of continued “aggressive actions” against Ukraine, including due to the alleged “invasion” of the country.
“It is impossible to impose restrictions on Russia and not suffer the consequences - this is impossible”, the official representative of the Kremlin on the Rossiya 1 television channel stated.
Peskov says this is "understood by everyone in the world."
Earlier it was reported that the United States is considering the possibility of introducing anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as a last resort.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to introduce restrictions that will make it more difficult to convert rubles into dollars for Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
At the same time, Sberbank CEO German Gref is confident that this is impossible.
From thoughtful people - respectively, thoughtful comments!
Something from these simple recipes is already making me nauseous.
It seems the ideas have run out.
Even in the distant past, my mother baked delicious pies and cakes, and no piece of bread smeared with jam could compare with a cake.
Ksenia, you don’t need to bring anything to my mind, my mind will figure it out on its own!
"The inability of the mind divided from the Spirit to perceive" - what are you talking about?!
Imagine having to explain this to an inattentive child, how would you do it?!
(Keep in mind that a child up to 3-5 years old still has open channels to the subtle world, and the child may know more than you!)
New Caledonia rejects French independence idea
According to the final results of the third independence referendum in New Caledonia, a large majority of participants refused to leave France.
This was reported by the French BFM.TV channel on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted opposed independence.
3.51% of the archipelago's population supported independence from France.
The results of 2.99% of the ballots were annulled.
Turnout on the day was very low: around 55% of the archipelago's population turned out to vote.
According to experts, the low turnout is explained by the calls of separatists to boycott the referendum due to the coronavirus.
Paris refused to move the referendum date.
In October 2020, the people of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
A referendum on independence was held in the region in 2018.
Most of the residents supported the archipelago's inclusion in France.
New Caledonia is almost 20,000 kilometres from mainland France.
In 1853, France declared New Caledonia to be its possession.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, which has special administrative-territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and the New Caledonia administration stipulates that the region can hold a referendum on its independence every two years.
Boris, if you don't know the history, don't write.
The name of the city of Arsk is derived from the Bulgar-Tatar word "artysh" (mugwort).
The Udmurts (or Tatars) live in the northern areas of Baltashinsky, Kukmorsky districts.
The Udmurts are a beautiful, hardworking people, they have preserved their own language, they live in friendship with the Tatars, and they know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don't know your age, but I want to tell you that Motherland will never abandon you.
They throw idiots who shout "good slogans".
I am saying this to you with complete confidence, based on my life experience.
Don't piss in the well, you may have to drive!
WHO preliminary considers Omicron less dangerous than Delta
The World Health Organization (WHO) has preliminarily determined that "omicron" is less dangerous than the Delta strain of the coronavirus.
However, there are data on the reduced effectiveness of vaccines against the new variant of COVID-19.
As of December 9, omicron has been registered in 63 countries.
"Preliminary data and a significantly altered antigen profile of the omicron strain suggest reduced efficacy of the vaccine against infection and transmission.
Preliminary findings from South Africa suggest that it (the disease - rare) may be less severe than the "delta" variant, the World Health Organization said in a technical report.
The organization notes that all registered cases of infection with "omicron" in the EU are mild or asymptomatic.
However, the new strain, according to preliminary data, is spreading faster than the “Delta”.
There have been two cases of infection with the Omicron strain in Russia.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaleya Center said.
Anna Popova, head of the Federal Service for Surveillance on Consumer Rights Protection and Human Wellbeing, stated that there are no reliable data on whether the new coronavirus variant is less dangerous than the others.
In fact, the lack of sun for us, southern people, is very critical.
In ten days spent in Petersburg, somewhere in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our returning plane flew over the clouds.
Then I realized what I had been missing all this time in beautiful Peter.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To discover what you didn't know just a few days ago - eyes, mouth and skin wide open!
Those who see only water in the ocean
The one on the ground does not notice the mountains.
Your world of adventures +7 905 989 9172 What'sApp
Siberian Expeditions - we can even ruin your worst mood!
Svetlana, no, there is no such thing - they don't respond.
If your beloved, with whom you are going to spend the rest of your life, refuses your requests, then he is a parasite, who does not want to give back as much as he takes.
The problem with women is that they are slowly but surely taking on more and more.
And who is to blame if she grabbed the gun herself?
Four scenarios have been named for Zelensky in Ukraine
Former Verkhovna Rada deputy Vadim Denisenko listed four scenarios for President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky in 2022.
According to him, the head of state can remain without the support of the West, and possibly make compromises on Donbas.
On Sunday, December 12, Denisenko told the publication on the website “Glavred” about this.
The first option, which Denisenko called "the ideal storm," would see key western countries abandon Ukraine after reaching an agreement on the country's future without its participation.
Such a development will contribute to a deep crisis that Ukraine may face in 2023.
"At the same time, there is a reduction in the prices of key products that we traditionally export ... internal protests and opposition from key FPGs (financial-industrial groups. - Ed.) are added by the former parliamentarian.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the development of the situation - "war against everyone."
This forecast will come true in the event of high political turbulence, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
As a result of such a situation, the leadership of Ukraine may be forced to compromise on Donbas, which could lead to an internal conflict.
By the end of the summer, Zelenskiy’s position will weaken, and the likelihood of such a situation is 50-55%, according to the former deputy.
The third option for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is a clash between the groups of people who are opposed to Zelensky and the president, which would lead to the seizure of control over the power bloc and the implementation of populist initiatives.
During this variant of the crisis, Zelensky will begin “reforming power”, added Denisenko.
Another scenario is to turn Zelensky into “the father of the nation”.
This can be brought about by some event that will be a powerful shock to society.
"The event should be significant enough to provoke a reaction from external partners and lead to an increase in support for Ukraine," Denisenko said.
Such a development of the situation is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a technological catastrophe or aggressive actions of Russia, believes the former deputy.
At the same time, the Russian side has already rejected any possibility of an attack on Ukraine.
In Moscow, it was noted that it was the Ukrainian authorities, NATO and the United States that are increasing military activity near the Russian borders.
Previously, on November 11, the sociological group “Rating” showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president fell to record low levels, reaching 19.3%.
It is the lowest rating since he was elected president.
Analysts predicted that in the event of the upcoming presidential elections in Ukraine, Zelensky would receive 21.8% of the vote, while the former president of the country, Petro Poroshenko, would receive 14.5%.
At the same time, only 19.3% of those surveyed expressed support for the president.
KAISER Sena (74182)
The KAISER Sena (74182) is one of the best choices in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability of work, which is also confirmed by many customer reviews on external Internet resources.
When you purchase this product from us, you also receive a guarantee from our side on the quality and functionality of the product.
We deliver by transport companies throughout Russia and to any region.
In the event of any defects being found, we will refund you the full price you paid without any problems.
When you call the operator, you can get a personal discount on this product.
Please leave a review after purchase.
Thank you for the story about the great athlete, I didn’t know that Elena Shushunova had died, it was very upsetting to learn.
I remember how she cheered for her at the Olympics in Seoul, for us, residents of Primorye, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such a passion, the emotions were overwhelming, I remember the joy when Elena won.
They were also happy for the other victories, as they cheered for Salnikov, the footballers, and all the Soviet athletes at that time.
I once saw a documentary about one of the Central American countries, and they were throwing coconuts overboard like barrels.
The pumpkins were enormous.
I have worked on harvesting and loading watermelons in Astrakhan Oblast many times and have never seen a watermelon weighing more than a pound.
I buy cucumbers weighing 4-5 kg directly from the stand and not before the beginning of August.
A balconette bustier with soft lace cups (size: 90E, color: beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, article: 12008).
A busthalter-balconette with soft crocheted cups, on a frame.
The bottom of the cup is reinforced with a non-elastic transparent plastic.
The inner side of the cup, in the area of the seam, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric, without additional seams, for comfort.
This element allows the fabric to stretch.
The richness of the embroidery can be appreciated through the décolleté and under the bust.
Vertical ridges on the side panels of the single-layer microfiber fabric do not allow the fabric to wrinkle on a large scale.
I didn’t like the article, it was mean-spirited and poisonous.
They passed by people who you know nothing about.
But now it is liked by many, people are splitting atoms.
I hope that the commenters are fair-minded and well-informed.
In Moscow, you will think about going to the store 100 times, and you will see migrants everywhere, in crowds.
They consider themselves the owners.
And are you serious about child benefits and pensions?
Loans are available up to 3 years, pensions are 12,000, someone wrote about dentistry, prosthetics is expensive and very expensive.
People are like people from another planet.
In France, it is bad, but here it is good?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact structure, comfortable elasticity and firmness, wear and tear resistance and durability properties.
The Butisson brand product from the Sense series is designed for the rehabilitation of people suffering from joint and circulatory system diseases.
The construction provides uniform load distribution over the surface and a pronounced comfort effect.
The Beauty Sense Hard S600 mini is based on the Beauty Sense Hard S600 mini with reduced spring height.
Beautyson uses spanbond, coconut coir and polyurethane as its internal fillers.
Spandbond serves as an intermediate isolating layer between the soft materials and the springs.
The orthopedic gel with coal tar is decorated on the surface of the figure, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is hypoallergenic material that gives the mattress high moisture-wicking and breathability properties.
The mattress cover is made from a dense jacquard fabric with synthetic fibres.
The material is durable and long-lasting, does not wear out and does not require special care.
The poet, who was arrested for the action on Red Square, said: "For the citation of Evtushenko, they will give you ten days, here it is, the power of poetry!"
On the first day of the week, 21-year-old poet Alexander Volchenkov was arrested for ten days.
A student from the Higher School of Economics was detained on Red Square with a placard that read #poetsofrussia are more than poets.
This quote is attributed to writer Yevgeny Yevtushenko.
Alexander was issued a summons for an administrative violation of public order.
He was first detained on January 23 on Pushkin Square, at a rally in support of Alexei Navalny.
"The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, unfortunately, interest in it, unfortunately, has been lost, and the decline of the general culture in Russia is also a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems under this hashtag," Alexander explains.
We have reached out to the young poet to learn more about the circumstances of his arrest and to better understand his message.
How did the police officers treat you in this case and in the past?
What did the department ask about your action?
This time the staff were more polite, the detention was as minimal as possible, courteous, as it would sound in a certain context of this word.
The OMONs were taken out of Pushkinskaya, and they were taken down hard.
They asked the standard questions about motivation.
When they heard, they were, in principle, looking if not approvingly, then understandingly.
Except for the four-sided blow, everything was perfectly correct, but I knew what I was doing.
And if, after the hashtag, people start writing their poems, even a few of them, I will not waste these 10 days.
According to the protocol, you should speak the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe alone.
At public and official events, they speak the language of the people around them so that everyone can understand what happened in the Bundestag on 25 September 2001, either in their native language through a translator.
This is the protocol and nothing more, incidentally, Angela Merkel speaks Russian very well and yet still uses a translator.
And at official events, a stenographer takes notes by hand, but the stenographer does not have to know several languages.
I don't want to say many words, just say no!
But that's a lot of water.
Well, to travel for a year "to the Andes, then to Nepal."
Before converting all of its assets into liquid shares.
And gradually sell these shares, opening an account in any bank in the world.
To sell not in dollars, but in a less dependent on the United States currency, for example, Swiss francs.
And then I will file for divorce from America.
However, this is not the only thing that keeps Americans in the United States.
They are confident that the United States is better than anywhere else.
They are grown that way.
The Hansgrohe Quattro three-outlet (15930180) system.
Collection: Quattro; Type: concealed installation mechanism; Purpose: for mixer, for bath, for washbasin; Built-in systems: yes; Mounting type: built-in (in the wall); Body material: brass; Concealed installation mechanism: included; Number of mounting holes: 1; Country of brand origin: Germany; Manufacturer's article number: 15930180; Barcode: 4011097345239.
Additional information: regulator required; kit contents: ceramic cartridge, O-ring; 3 consumers; possible simultaneous operation of 2 consumers (showers); suitable for all Quattro kits; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers explain how potatoes help in the fight against age-related decline
The study found that potatoes are rich in vitamins and minerals that help improve circulation and lower cholesterol levels.
The root contains vitamins of the B group, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
All these elements help to function the body's systems.
In addition, potatoes help in the fight against age-related diseases.
Thanks to its high fibre content, it is beneficial to the digestive tract, and regular consumption can also help prevent hypertension and atherosclerosis.
However, for the greatest benefit, the root vegetable should be boiled or stewed, not fried in oil.
Earlier, The Daily Express warned that potatoes can be dangerous for diabetics, as well as other high-glycemic-index foods.
These products contain carbohydrates that are quickly broken down into sugars, such as sugar, sweet soft drinks, white rice and white bread.
In early December, Kommersant warned of a possible shortage of Russian table potatoes, noting a decrease in production in private farms and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the shortage of products at the moment can only be replaced by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates have removed themselves from Yandex’s list
Candidates for expulsion
In 2015, the owners of the Rake/Media cluster compiled a list of the 100 largest pirate websites on the Russian Internet, and most of them ceased to exist, says the director of the Institute of Internet Research, Karen Kazaryan.
But some, such as Kinogo, Lostfilm and Filmix, have managed to survive, he adds.
For example, on Lostfilm, which is available in search results as “Yandex” and Google, you can watch pirated copies of the Netflix series “Squid Game” and “Love” by director Anna Melikyan - the original series of the largest Russian video service ivi (part of AIV).
Kinogo, which is also available through search engines, allows you to watch the animated film "Encanto", but judging by the quality of the video, it is a so-called screen capture (a pirated copy of the film recorded in a cinema).
Filmix, which can also be found through search engines, has the series “Univer. 10 Years Later” from the TNT channel (part of “Gazprom Media”).
Svetlana, of course, but I would not care if my son was angry with his mother or not.
If there is any confusion, it is better not to meet, as it may get in the way of your path.
Of course, it is good that such things happen rarely.
The coffee 135I GI1265 with soft cups without a frame and a front panel.
The T-shaped backrest is reinforced from the inside with cross-linked elastic straps made of cotton and Lycra.
The busthalter is made of microfibre combined with a mesh fabric for breathability.
Plates with dubbing made from cotton fabric for a comfortable fit.
The unique design of the Magiclift (under-bust and décolletage supporting inserts) to lift, separate and support the breasts.
The wide, comfortable trousers with a microfibre lining are adjustable from the back.
Ludmila, China now has the most advanced space technology.
Russia is already hopelessly behind.
"This idea, developed by the Poles," it would be more accurate to say, "was merely reworked by the Poles, but developed in a very practical way."
The slogan “The suburbs are not Russia” appeared in 1848.
In general, this does not change the essence.
I watched her interview, and the girl said her biggest dream is to grow wings, and her dad is constantly teasing her about it.
Well, it's all very suspicious.
Well, she got into the university, and what next?
Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara wall light.
A wide circle, surrounded by "molecules" of light, provides the most even and bright illumination of the space.
The "atomic" or "molecular" design, reflecting the essence and natural nature of each object, is not losing its relevance and allows you to highlight accents in the interior.
One of the distinctive features of such lamps is their weightlessness.
By using thin, almost invisible wires that are regulated by height, an illusion is created that the chandelier is floating in the air.
The metal gold-plated fittings and matte-white mini-chandeliers will easily complement any palette, and the hanging light and table lamp presented in the collection will become a ready-made ensemble for lighting the living room, bedroom and hallway.
Well, taste and colour, as they say.
I really liked Tarhun, not the current one, of course.
The juices were very tasty and came in tall glass bottles.
Three portions of syrup is too much for my taste.
Two were fine.
Dimax Micro Ultimate mattress, 160x190
Orthopedic spring mattress Micro Ultimate.
The model is convenient because it has two different levels of softness – high firmness and slightly more than average.
Only high-quality and premium fillers have been included in the product, which have proven themselves exclusively in the best way.
Springs: A block of independent springs “micro-pack” is installed in the center of the model.
This means that the bed has 2000 spirals, which work completely autonomously.
It is their functioning that gives a unique point-by-point adjustment.
The "Mikropaket" is the most high-frequency of all the "Dimask" spring blocks, so it has a very pronounced orthopedic effect and is considered premium.
Fillers: Coir and natural latex layers are placed on top and bottom of the springs.
The only difference is the order of the tiles.
If one surface is latex, then the other is coconut coir.
Such a tandem of mattress fillers has long been established as a classic, since it transfers not only orthopedic, but also anatomical properties to the mattress.
If the latex provides the right support for the back, then the latex will give a surface adaptation to the body.
Cover: The model is supplied in a drawstring pouch made from Aloe Vera.
The client can have it made either as a removable or as a permanent fixture.
The total height of the product is 27 cm, the recommended load for the bed is 170 kg.
Warranty and safety: the warranty period is 3 years.
The mattress has received all the necessary certificates and documents confirming its full safety and reliability in operation.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certification.
Estonian scientists will search for life on Venus
Massachusetts Institute of Technology in collaboration with Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies is preparing three missions to Venus to search for signs of life in the atmosphere, the "Actual Camera" reported on Sunday.
The goal of the five-year mission is to assess the habitability of Venus' clouds, and then search for life there.
Tartu scientists have proposed instruments for measuring acidity and oxygen content in Venus clouds.
Previously, it was assumed that the clouds of Venus, the closest planet to Earth, were too acidic to support life, but it is now believed that Venus was originally a terrestrial planet.
A sample from Venus is expected to arrive during the third mission.
If we find life there, the main question will be whether it is similar to life on Earth or different.
If it is very similar, then it will be obvious that life on Earth did not begin on Earth.
If it differs, it may be more likely that life originated on Earth," said the head of the Estonian team of the "Venus Life Finder" project, Mihkel Pajusel.
A hat, not a phone...
It's been a year, and the price...
This Chinese nonsense has already gotten old...
They can't make a quality phone...
Even if you take my Samsung, it has already survived three of these (my friends have already thrown them away) and it will survive even more!
The metaverse will change the Russian business
The topic of the metaverse has become popular this fall, when Mark Zuckerberg announced the transformation of Facebook into Meta.
For the market, this event was a significant signal: the largest player confirmed the development of a new form of digital interaction between people.
Therefore, the business in Russia, as well as in the world, will invest in the creation of its own metaverse and its subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as a continuation of the objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, the trend towards the creation of remote interactions in the conditions of the pandemic, since people are tired of isolation and restrictions.
On the other hand, this is a consequence of businesses' desire to develop ecosystems and adapt their operations to them.
The third is the logical continuation of the trend of digitalizing assets, where any rights, securities, artworks and even money can be digitized.
Anna, you are right, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating properly, you don't want to eat anything too fatty or unhealthy.
Of course, we will have the traditional feast and stuffed wild boar, but no one is forcing me to eat it all at once.
You can eat it with a spoon, try it - and that's enough.
After all, there are ten days ahead, and you can prepare any tasty and healthy dishes.
And how much hellish effort, time, and resources it took her to train.
And after performing 5 jumps, she was left without a gold medal.
And she also understands that she will not be an Olympic champion for the next four years, i.e. she will never be an Olympic champion.
And those who have not engaged in sports or cannot imagine all the circles of hell she has gone through will not be able to handle it.
British economist could not give a forecast for 2022
British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to give a forecast for 2022, as he believes such attempts will fail.
He wrote about it in an article for Project Syndicate.
An expert believes that the next year will be full of unpredictability and any trend can change the course.
The most important factor is the coronavirus pandemic, he believes.
O'Neill also admitted he didn't know if the price hike was temporary or not.
As a specialist noted, even before the pandemic it was clear that "the world of unlimited generosity of central banks has outlived itself" and it was time to return to the relationship where interest rates adjusted to inflation and GDP growth expectations.
O'Neill noted that in the wake of the pandemic, continuing with a loose monetary policy could, according to some experts, lead to a new wave of inflation.
In addition, O'Neill noted the issue of productivity, as well as the rise in poverty and climate change.
Earlier, Mikhail Shulgin, head of the global research department at Open Investment, reported that positive expectations for the dollar in 2022 remain, but the potential for growth will be less significant.
Among the risks for the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and credit policy of the Federal Reserve, the dynamics of oil prices and fears in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic.
She had to agree.
But one thing is comforting: if you compare yourself to five years ago, there were fewer containers.
Now it is better.
Progress is slow.
There is another problem: there are many environmental initiatives in cities, but people are unaware of them.
Any eco-taxis that collect waste from the home.
In short, the point of receiving waste is that it is used by the marginals.
Very few people bring glass and metal there.
And the author...
Pork sausages with cats on Soviet factories?
“Low” chocolate in the USSR?
Well, they are not as tasty as Doshirak, I understand...
But I would turn the Soviet confectionery with white filling.
There are no more of them.
They don’t release “Pilot”, but “Romashka” is completely different...
Car mats EVA (rectangle) for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
The car mats EVA are made of high-quality material produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats is made up of rhombus-shaped cells.
The thickness of the mats is 10 mm, the depth of the cells is 5-6 mm.
The mats do not absorb or let water through.
Dirt is evenly distributed across the cells, keeping the surface clean.
The material used to make the mats is elastic, wear-resistant, and odorless.
It retains its properties in a temperature range from -50 to 50 °C.
The mats are easy to care for and are suitable for year-round use.
The EVA mats cover the standard carpet, covering the left foot rest area.
The rear row is closed by a cover.
The edging is made from ultra-strong car rope.
Dimax Practik Basis Plus V13 180x220 cm mattress
The Dimax (Dimax) Practic Basis Plus 13 mattress has a single type of filling.
This is a 13-cm-high artificial latex plate.
The mattress has a symmetrical average firmness on both sides.
The item is lined with a jacquard cover with a drawstring on the comfort layer, removable or non-removable type, as desired.
PPU is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial latex (PLA) are characteristics similar to the natural analogue, but at a lower cost.
Artificial latex is elastic and elastic, but, unlike natural material, it has greater rigidity.
It forms the anatomical surface of the mattress with quality support, which ensures a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not accumulate moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the durability and wear resistance of the mattress.
A quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, affordable and temperature-stable, this mattress is ideal for a guest room or country house.
Its universal medium firmness and maximum load of up to 100 kg make this mattress suitable for most users.
Russians have given auto dealers about 4.5% of the country's GDP
According to the results of 10 months of 2021, Russians spent 2 trillion 784 billion rubles on the purchase of new cars, which is 28% more than in the same period of the previous year, according to the statistics of the Russian Automotive Market Research (RAMP) agency.
To understand the scale - about the same amount (about 3 trillion rubles) was spent by the state to support citizens and the economy during the coronavirus pandemic.
In September last year, President Vladimir Putin said that the amount was comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) for 2020.
In terms of income, the Korean brand Kia leads the Russian market.
In 10 months of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 32.57 billion rubles, which is almost 24% more than last year.
The growth of the related Kia brand of Hyundai is even more significant - more than 35%, and the revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at 27.93 billion rubles.
At the top of the rankings, this brand and the average price of the car have increased by 21% over the year, to 1.94 million rubles - the inflation rate was only higher at Changan, Chery, Geely and Mercedes-Benz.
At the same time, the volume of sales of Korean brands grew not so much: according to the statistics of the Automobile Manufacturers Association of the European Business Association in Russia, for the same period, Kia sold 9.4% more cars than the previous year.
Hyundai - almost 12%.
Japanese Toyota closes the trio of leaders in terms of sales volume in monetary terms - Russians spent 27.55 billion rubles on cars of this brand in the last 10 months, which is 14% more than last year.
For the Japanese, Mercedes-Benz is worth 26.61 billion rubles (+75%) - the German premium brand has grown in volume of sales (by 37%) and average vehicle price (by almost 28%, to 8.2 million rubles).
"Mercedes-Benz is experiencing both good sales growth and average price growth - higher, for example, than BMW - which explains the greater financial capacity, explained the General Director of NAPI Tatyana Arabaeva. -
Chinese brands have also significantly increased their financial capacity this year, demonstrating fantastic sales growth rates."
The Russian Lada brand demonstrates average growth in income, with plus 28% year-on-year. Russians spent 22.94 billion rubles on Lada cars in the last 10 months.
Last year, the financial strength of companies was at the same level as in 2021: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is in the red - Russians spent 12 billion rubles on UAZs and pickups this year, compared to 12.4 billion rubles last year.
Against the backdrop of problems with the supply of auto components and production disruptions affecting the entire global auto industry, automakers continue to continuously adjust prices - the same AvtoVAZ has raised the prices of its Lada models seven times in a year, with the last price hike (of 8-10 thousand rubles) taking place at the end of November.
Regularly rewrite their price lists for their own products and those of other automakers.
The volume of the Russian automotive market in monetary terms will continue to grow beyond the deficit of cars, and this is due not only to the shortage of cars, but also to inflation, as well as the desire of automakers to make up for past losses, experts say.
In the face of a car shortage, I think many carmakers have been able to pass on some of the costs of the past that they couldn't put into the price of a car earlier,
Vladimir Bespalov, an analyst at VTB Capital, says: -
I think the financial side of the car industry is feeling very good at the moment, maintaining high margins on sales."
This is indicated by the growth rates of car prices in 2021, which are faster than inflation, an expert explains.
In the long run, the market will grow both in terms of quantity and in terms of money, but mainly due to inflation and the complexity of the machines themselves, predicts Bespapov.
As the supply increases, the opportunities to raise prices will be limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian automotive market will continue to grow in the coming year, even if the growth in the cost of cars slows down, notes independent automotive consultant Sergey Burgazliev.
Considering the increased demand and insufficient supply, automakers are now trying to get the highest profit from each car sold, notes Burgazliev. -
Increased production volumes are not expected in the near future, and in Russia the situation is further aggravated by citizens' uncertainty about the future.
In the face of the situation on the market, cars have turned out to be a good investment - a car bought a year ago, even with mileage, can now be sold for more than the original purchase price, notes an expert.
Biden has spoken about the possibility of sending US troops to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The United States has never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a "Russian invasion."
President Joe Biden made the statement.
"Never was such a plan," the White House chief said in response to a question from a journalist about whether the United States had abandoned such an idea.
Biden noted that in the event of escalation of the situation around Ukraine, Russia will face economic consequences.
He stressed that the United States and NATO have no obligation to use military force to protect Ukraine in the event of escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of using American troops unilaterally to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invaded Ukraine, the United States would send forces to Eastern European NATO countries (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, Czech Republic and Estonia).
"We're going to have to send more American and NATO troops to the eastern flank, B9 - all the countries of NATO, on which we have a sacred obligation to defend them from any attack from Russia," Biden said.
Earlier, the press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, noted that Moscow does not have any intentions to invade Ukraine.
Moscow, he said, sees the problem in the use of Turkish drones by Kiev, as well as in the fact that "American weapons are approaching our territory."
I immediately leave such interviews.
If they want to make me listen to screams, wait hours, drink something incomprehensible and wash a cup - it's horrible to imagine what it will be like at work.
I will find a normal place, without the middleman, where I can immediately talk to the boss.
The Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 100x185 cm mattress
The average height of the non-spring mattress Protex-Orient Monolit Kombi 16 is made of alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is moderately hard, the other is moderately hard.
The beautiful white cover made of jacquard is attached to the synthetic fabric and is decorated with lightning around the perimeter.
Two types of filler.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of filling.
Between the sheets of plastic, thin sheets of coconut cork are laid.
The layered structure of the mattress has increased wear resistance, durability and resistance to loads.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, and breathable material.
The filler maintains its shape and recovers quickly after loading.
Coconut coir strengthens the product, naturally possessing antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows for the creation of a load-bearing orthopedic bed that will serve buyers for many years.
Universality and orthopedic support.
Mattresses are suitable for people of all body types and ages.
The medium-firm surface is balanced by a combination of orthopedics and comfort.
The reverse side of the model is less comfortable for soft tissues, but has more pronounced orthopedic properties.
A moderately firm mattress is more appropriate for those who need to "decompress" their backs and get a good night's sleep.
The mattress is ideal for one person as well as a couple.
The latter are especially likely to appreciate the presence of a stable surface and the absence of the "wave" effect, whereby vibrations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the other, disturbing a person in sleep.
Molbert tabletop "Studio" 20*24*54(65) cm for canvas 40 cm.
The desk "Studio" with a height-adjustable upper holder.
It will fit a small hall.
The material is natural wood, lacquered.
It will be convenient for both beginners and professional artists.
Smooth angle adjustment.
It is equipped with a shelf for hats and tablets.
The top holder securely fixes the canvas.
The maximum height of a mobel is 65 cm, the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a scammer calls from such a number, like a "policeman" or another law enforcement agency, then it is ineffective to hang up right away, and it is unlikely that you will be able to add the number to the blacklist in time.
Because he quickly repeats his lies about his association with the security forces and continues to harass and coerce.
More useful advice for the people.
That's rubbish...
I can't believe it.
They don't know what to do or who to blame.
The Queen has reached them.
And the most important thing, according to them, is that everyone is to blame, except for the very-very...
It would have been easier to leave people alone if we cared about our people.
Maybe all the strains of the virus will disappear...
As in Japan... before the elections, the influence and infection rates decreased...
The "Assortment No. 2" wool yarn is 100% merino wool, 4 x 10 g.
Wool spinning has been a craft for over 8,000 years, but it was very difficult to find wool from animals, and even more difficult to find colored wool.
But now it's all over!
We present a delicate, natural wool yarn from a Russian manufacturer, which does not require you to run through the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of wool allow you to create bright and unique items.
For example, you can make a small toy for yourself or your baby, appliques for creativity, jewelry, decorations for the interior and even clothes and accessories.
Imagine a pair of woolly sheep on your blanket, a small photo frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that will look great with the new dress, or unique home slippers that no one else will have…
Bring your ideas to life, "shedding" this wonderful fur!
Maria Kartazova, what does that mean?
I don't speak my thoughts out loud, I mentally curse you all.
I mentally cut off everyone who didn't give way to me, I mentally sent them to the ditch and burned all the cars that were blocking my way, I mentally did it all!
And I can even smile at you.
But I remember that the thought is material!
Peter, the Second, did not sign any death sentences during his reign.
Even the likes of Cob and his crew.
And the bloody Sunday is a fabrication of the Bolsheviks.
The Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190 mattress.
The mattress is firm on both sides.
The natural material of coconut coir is hypoallergenic and adds the necessary firmness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK (512 springs per mattress) will provide a unique comfort and correct support for the spine during sleep.
A cotton Jacquard coverlet, 200 g.
The hallway provides protection and comfort.
Maximum load on one bed: 130 kg.
My horse.
A stable with accessories, 6 pieces in the display.
The enchanting pony lives in a cosy, fold-up pink cottage.
If you open the doll's house, you can install a kitchen in one of its halves, and on the other half you can set up a table with food for guests.
The pony has big eyes, its mane and tail can be brushed with a comb.
The set includes: a 9 cm pony, a sewing kit, a house (2 halves), a built-in table (2 parts), a kitchen (2 parts), accessories: scissors (2 parts), a cake with a heart (2 parts), a juice bottle, two glasses, a teacup and a saucer.
MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90x190x27, weight 27.9 kg.
The alternating layers of latex and hard coconut coir give a body-hugging effect.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress can withstand a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
However, there is no wave effect: the spouses, lying next to each other, do not slide towards each other regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model were subjected to rigorous quality control.
They are ventilated, do not dry out, do not absorb odors.
A unique microclimate is created thanks to full air circulation, which promotes healthy rest.
High-strength thermo-glue was used to bond the parts together.
The film of the student of Alexander Sokurov received the European "Oscar" for the best editing
The Russian film "Holding Hands" nominated for the "Oscar" received the award of the European Film Academy (also known as the "European Oscar") in the "Best Editing" category, reports "Moskovsky Komsomolets".
The online voting of the jury, which was complicated by the epidemiological situation, evaluated the outstanding craftsmanship of the film's creators.
This time, the film by Jasmila Žbanić (Bosnia) “Where are you going, Aida?” received the most awards.
The main character of the film is a United Nations translator who is trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the drama "Holding Hands," directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of the Alexander Sokurov workshop), this film tells about the difficult relationship between a powerful father and the children who want to break free from their father's control in North Ossetia.
Previously, it was announced that this film was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As regular friendly meetings between the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan, and Turkey show, in my opinion, you are not in the right place.
Only yesterday, the President of Azerbaijan approved the opening of a joint Azerbaijani-Russian KamAZ plant.
